HALLIBURTON  AND  U.S.  BUSINESS  TIES  TO  IRAN

S.  HRG.  110–101

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, 

TRADE, AND TOURISM

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

APRIL  30,  2007

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

35–959 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2007

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  INTERSTATE  COMMERCE,  TRADE,  AND  TOURISM 

BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 

JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 30, 2007 ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan .................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg ..........................................................................

WITNESSES 

Brown, Hon. Sherrod, U.S. Senator from Ohio .....................................................
Comras,  Esq.,  Victor  D.,  Attorney/Consultant,  Special  Counsel,  Eren  Law 
Firm .......................................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Thompson, Jr., William C., Comptroller, City of New York ................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Williams, Sherry, Vice President/Corporate Secretary, Halliburton Company ..
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

Page 
1
1
4
5

6

16
18
8
11
13
14

Halliburton Company, supplementary information ..............................................

35

APPENDIX 

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

HALLIBURTON  AND  U.S.  BUSINESS  TIES  TO 

IRAN 

MONDAY,  APRIL  30,  2007

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INTERSTATE COMMERCE, TRADE, AND 
TOURISM, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met at 2 p.m. in room SR–253, Russell Senate 
Office  Building,  Hon.  Byron  L.  Dorgan,  Chairman  of  the
Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator  DORGAN.  We’ll  call  the  hearing  to  order.  This  is  a  hear-
ing of the Interstate Commerce, Trade, and Tourism Subcommittee. 
We are joined today by Senator Lautenberg and I’ve invited Sen-
ator  Brown,  who  has  legislation  on  the  issue  that  is  the  subject  of 
the hearing, to join us today. We will be joined by other colleagues 
as well. 

Today’s  hearing  is  intended  to  examine  the  question  of  whether 
U.S.  corporations  should  be  able  to  do  business  in  countries  that 
are  prohibited,  countries  with  whom  we  have  economic  sanctions. 
Particularly  in  this  case  we  will  talk  about  Iran,  but  other  coun-
tries are involved as well. 

Should  U.S.  corporations  be  able  to  do  business  in  these  coun-
tries  through  their  foreign  subsidiaries?  We  have  a  number  of 
countries  that  are  subject  at  this  point  to  sanctions,  the  countries 
of Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Sudan, Syria, for example. 

This  country  has  passed  legislation  dealing  with  a  number  of 
these countries. With the country of Iran, we have passed the Iran 
Sanctions  Act.  In  a  number  of  cases,  we  know  from  information 
that  we  have  received  and  we  know  from  public  published  reports 
that  American-chartered  corporations  have  done  business  through 
the exceptions that exist with a number of these countries. 

Let  me  speak  especially  about  the  country  of  Iran  for  the  mo-
ment, but it applies, as I understand it, to other countries as well. 
When  our  country  with  a  foreign  policy  objective  establishes 
sanctions against another country, a prohibited country, suggesting 
that for foreign policy reasons we want to prohibit certain economic 
activity and certain connections between our country and theirs, in 
order  to,  through  economic  sanctions,  apply  some  pressure  and 
some injury to a country for behaving in a manner that is not con-
sistent with the manner that we determine appropriate. 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2

In  circumstances  where  those  companies  are  prohibited  from 
doing  business  in  those  prohibited  countries,  however,  companies 
are  able  to,  in  some  circumstances,  circumvent  that  by  doing  busi-
ness through foreign subsidiaries, wholly owned or partially owned 
foreign subsidiaries. 

In the case of Iran, for example, the U.S. law that we passed con-
tains a loophole. The Iran Sanctions Act allows foreign subsidiaries 
of  U.S.  corporations  to  do  business  with  Iran,  so  long  as  the  sub-
sidiary operates independently. 

We  have  invited  a  number  of  witnesses  today.  One  of  the  wit-
nesses is the Halliburton Company. Halliburton is a U.S.-chartered 
corporation  that  has  had  some  publicity  about  it  doing  business 
with the country of Iran through a foreign subsidiary. 

In  2004,  60  Minutes  did  a  report  that  disclosed  how  Halliburton 
had  a  subsidiary  in  the  Cayman  Islands  with  headquarters  in 
Dubai,  which  did  hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  worth  of  business 
in the country of Iran. 

In the 60 Minutes testimony, excuse me, 60 Minutes report, it ap-
peared  the  Cayman  Islands  office  was  not  much  more  than  a  mail 
drop  and  the  Dubai  office,  which  was  supposed  to  operate  inde-
pendently  of  the  Houston-based  company,  60  Minutes  found  that 
the  Dubai  subsidiary  shared  office  space,  phone  and  fax  lines  with 
a division of the Houston company. 

Halliburton is by no means the only company that has had busi-
ness  ties  to  Iran  or  in  other  cases  with  other  countries  that  have 
been  prohibited  countries  by  fashioning  that  business  through  a 
foreign subsidiary. 

There’s  no  question  that,  for  example,  with  Iran  there  are  sub-
stantial  oil  and  gas  reserves.  There’s  no  question  that  some  cor-
porations  in  this  country  would  want  to  do  business  in  Iran  even 
though it is a prohibited country and so we understand why, under 
current law, some companies have decided it’s in their economic in-
terest to fashion foreign subsidiaries to do this kind of business. 

The  question  that  we  pose  at  this  hearing  is;  should  this  be  the 
case.  If  we  have  a  national  goal  here  of  establishing  sanctions  for 
good reason, should we allow those purposes of the sanctions to be 
undermined  by  U.S.  companies  creating  foreign  subsidiaries,  or 
through  foreign  subsidiaries,  doing  business  with  a  prohibited 
country? Does that not, in fact, undermine the very thing we’re at-
tempting to accomplish? 

The  State  Department,  again,  continuing  with  Iran,  says,  ‘‘Iran 
is  the  most  active  state  sponsor  of  terrorism’’—says  that  ‘‘Iran  has 
maintained  a  high  profile  role  in  encouraging  anti-Israeli  terrorist 
activity, rhetorically, operationally, and financially.’’

The  Supreme  Leader  and  the  President  of  Iran  has  praised  the 
Palestinian  terrorist  operations.  Iran  has  provided  the  Lebanese 
Hezbollah and Palestinian terrorist groups, notably, Hamas and Is-
lamic  Jihad, 
training  and  weapons.  President 
Ahmadinejad  recently  hosted  a  conference  aimed  at  denying  the 
historical truth of the Holocaust. 

I  raise  all  this  simply  to  say  there  are  reasons,  important  and 
strong reasons that this country has decided to impose sanctions on 
countries, in this case, Iran. I could give a similar discussion about 
North  Korea  and  Syria.  Having  said  that,  it  is  striking  to  me  that 

funding, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3

we have a law that would allow a U.S. company, through a foreign 
subsidiary, to do business with a prohibited country. Why on earth 
would we allow that? 

So  today’s  hearing  is  intended  to  ask  several  questions,  first, 
should it be legal for subsidiaries of U.S. companies to do business 
with  prohibited  countries  through  a  U.S.  subsidiary?  Senator  Lau-
tenberg is introducing legislation to close this loophole. 

Second, should U.S. companies that decide to do business with a 
prohibited  country,  in  this  case,  Iran,  be  eligible  for  Federal  con-
tracts? 

Senator  Brown  has  introduced  a  piece  of  legislation,  titled  the 
Restoring Integrity in Contracting Act of 2007. This bill would pro-
hibit U.S. companies that do business with Iran, through U.S. sub-
sidiaries and I believe it’s through any prohibited country; I’d have 
to check on that, from getting Federal contracts. 

Let  me  say  I’m  pleased  that  a  representative  of  Halliburton  has 
agreed to testify at this hearing. I would note that Halliburton has 
announced  that  it  will  no  longer  do  any  business  with  the  country 
of  Iran.  That’s  a  welcome  statement,  but  Halliburton  has  been  a 
major  U.S.  contractor  and  has  done  business  with  Iran  for  many 
years and we’ll talk about that. 

The  first  witness  today  will  be  Sherry  Williams,  Vice  President 

and Corporate Secretary of Halliburton. 

The  second  witness  is  William  Thompson,  the  Comptroller  of 
New  York  City.  Mr.  Thompson  oversees  $80  billion  in  pension 
funds  for  all  city  workers,  part  of  which  was  invested  in  Halli-
burton stock and that of other companies engaged in Iran and Mr. 
Thompson  has  been  instrumental  in  raising  these  issues  with  cor-
porations in a very important way. 

And the third witness is Victor Comras. Mr. Comras retired from 
the State Department in 2001 and is now a practicing attorney and 
consultant  on  matters  related  to  sanctions  and  embargos.  He  led 
the  State  Department’s  foreign  policy  trade  control  and  sanctions 
programs for nearly a decade. 

In 1999, Secretary Madeline Albright put him in charge of devel-
oping an international sanctions program on Serbia aimed at bring-
ing  down  the  Slobodan  Milosevic  regime.  He  also  served  as  the 
State  Department’s  point  man  on  sanctions  related  to  Iraq,  Iran, 
Libya, Haiti, Cuba and North Korea. 

I want to thank all the witnesses for appearing today and I want 
to  just  again  say,  the  reason  that  we  are  holding  this  hearing  is 
because many of us feel that we ought to answer a very important 
question.  If  this  country  has  objectives  by  which  it  imposes  sanc-
tions on countries and creates a list of prohibited countries, should 
there  be  any  circumstance  in  which  a  U.S.-chartered  corporation 
would  be  doing  business  with  those  prohibited  countries  by  cre-
ating a foreign subsidiary? 

I  think  not,  but  currently  the  law  allows  that  kind  of  end-run 
that I believe undermines our foreign policy objectives and we will, 
in  this  hearing  explore  whether  the  law  should  be  changed  and  if 
so, how it should be changed. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Dorgan follows:]

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Today’s  hearing  is  intended  to  examine  the  question  of  whether  U.S.  companies 

should be able to do business in Iran through their foreign subsidiaries. 

The  State  Department  lists  a  handful  of  countries  as  state  sponsors  of  terrorism, 
and  U.S.  law  generally  prohibits  U.S.  companies  with  doing  business  with  those 
countries, whether directly or through their foreign subsidiaries. 

But  in  the  case  of  Iran,  U.S.  law  contains  a  serious  loophole.  The  Iran  Sanctions 
Act  allows  foreign  subsidiaries  of  U.S.  companies  to  do  business  with  Iran,  so  long 
as the subsidiary operates independently. 

One of the U.S. companies that we know has had foreign subsidiaries do business 
with  Iran  is  Halliburton.  In  2004,  60  Minutes  did  a  report  that  showed  how  Halli-
burton had a subsidiary in the Cayman Islands, with headquarters in Dubai, which 
did hundreds of millions of dollars worth of business with Iran. The Cayman Islands 
office  was  little  more  than  a  mail  drop.  And  the  Dubai  office  was  supposedly  run 
independently  of  the  Houston-based  company,  but  the  60  Minutes  investigation 
found that the Dubai subsidiary shared office space, phone, and fax lines with a di-
vision of the Houston company. 

Halliburton  is  by  no  means  the  only  company  that  has  had  business  ties  to  Iran 
in  this  fashion.  But  it  was  one  of  its  most  vocal  in  defending  the  propriety  of  this 
type of arrangement. 

Vice  President  Cheney,  who  in  the  1990s  was  Chairman  of  Halliburton,  gave  a 
speech  to  an  energy  industry  conference  in  1996,  in  which  he  said  that  sanctions 
were the greatest threat to Halliburton and other American oil companies trying to 
expand overseas. He said that ‘‘we seem to be sanction-happy as a government’’ and 
that  ‘‘the  problem  is  that  the  good  Lord  didn’t  see  fit  to  always  put  oil  and  gas  re-
sources where there are democratic governments.’’

Indeed,  in  a  1998  speech  at  the  Cato  Institute,  Vice  President  Cheney  said  that 

U.S. companies were ‘‘cut out of the action’’ in Iran because of the sanctions. 

Well, there is no question that Iran has very substantial oil and gas reserves. But 
there  is  good  reason  why  the  United  States  makes  it  illegal  for  U.S.  companies  to 
do business with Iran. 

For  starters,  according  to  the  State  Department,  Iran  is  the  ‘‘most  active  state 
sponsor of terrorism.’’ The State Department says that Iran has ‘‘maintained a high-
profile  role  in  encouraging  anti-Israeli  terrorist  activity—rhetorically,  operationally, 
and  financially.’’  Supreme  Leader  Khamenei  and  President  Ahmadinejad  has 
praised Palestinian terrorist operations, and Iran has provided Lebanese Hezballah 
and  Palestinian  terrorist  groups—notably  Hamas,  and  Islamic  Jihad—with  exten-
sive  funding,  training,  and  weapons.  President  Ahmadinejad  recently  hosted  a  con-
ference aimed at denying the historical truth of the Holocaust. 

In addition, the Iranian regime is a country seemingly determined to acquire nu-
clear weapons. President Ahmadinejad has described the regime’s quest for nuclear 
energy as an ‘‘unstoppable train.’’

So  it  is  striking  that  U.S.  companies  would  permit  any  of  their  foreign  subsidi-
aries to do business with Iran, even if such an action were arguably legal under U.S. 
law. 

Today’s hearing is intended to ask several questions. 
First,  should  it  be  legal  for  subsidiaries  of  U.S.  companies  to  do  business  with 
Iran  through  a  U.S.  subsidiary?  Senator  Lautenberg  has  introduced  legislation  to 
close this loophole. 

Second,  should  U.S.  companies  who  do  business  with  Iran  be  eligible  for  Federal 
contracts?  Senator  Brown  has  introduced  S.  1004,  the  Restoring  Integrity  in  Con-
tracting  Act  of  2007,  a  bill  that  I  have  cosponsored.  This  bill  would  prohibit  U.S. 
companies  that  do  business  with  Iran  through  U.S.  subsidiaries  from  getting  Fed-
eral contracts. 

I  am  pleased  that  Halliburton  has  agreed  to  testify  at  this  hearing.  I  would  note 
that  after  we  announced  our  intention  to  hold  this  hearing,  Halliburton  announced 
that it would no longer do any business with Iran. That’s a welcome announcement, 
but  I  think  that  given  that  Halliburton  has  been  a  major  U.S.  contractor  and  has 
done business with Iran for years, we still have a lot to talk about. 

I should add that I expect that it is no easy step for Halliburton to appear before 
this  Subcommittee,  particularly  given  the  fact  that  I  have  been  critical  of  the  com-
pany  for  its  performance  relating  to  contracts  in  Iraq.  I  do  not  intend  to  focus  on 
the  subject  of  Iraq  contracting  at  this  hearing,  but  rather  to  focus  on  Iran—and 
there is plenty to discuss on the subject of Halliburton and Iran. 

The first witness, Sherry Williams is the Vice President and Corporate Secretary 

of Halliburton. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5

The second witness is William Thompson. the Comptroller of New York City. Mr. 
Thompson  oversees  the  $80  billion  in  pension  funds  for  all  city  workers,  part  of 
which  was  invested  in  Halliburton  stock  and  that  of  other  companies  engaged  in 
Iran. 

The  third  witness  is  Victor  Comras.  Mr.  Comras  retired  from  the  State  Depart-
ment  in  2001,  and  is  now  a  practicing  attorney  and  consultant  on  matters  related 
to  sanctions  and  embargoes.  Mr.  Comras  led  the  U.S.  State  Department’s  foreign 
policy trade control and sanctions programs for nearly a decade. In 1999, Secretary 
Madeleine Albright put him in charge of developing an international sanctions pro-
gram  on  Serbia  aimed  at  bringing  down  the  Slobodan  Milosevic  regime.  He  also 
served  as  the  State  Department’s  point-man  on  sanctions  related  to  Iraq,  Iran, 
Libya, Haiti, Cuba and North Korea. 

I  thank  all  the  witnesses  for  appearing  today.  I  should  note  that  though  Senator 
Brown  is  not  a  member  of  the  Commerce  Committee,  I  have  invited  him  to  join  us 
today given his interest in these issues.

Let me call on Senator Lautenberg. 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thanks,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  holding  this 
important  hearing.  It  seems  impossible  to  imagine  that  American 
companies  would  try  to  circumvent  the  law  and  do  business  with 
an  enemy  of  ours,  when  we  are  actively  at  war,  when  we  keep  on 
losing troops there, in Iraq. So, I think this is a particularly oppor-
tune moment to discuss this. 

I  want  to  start  off  by  talking  about  a  young  woman,  who  came 
from New Jersey, from Teaneck, New Jersey. Her name was Sarah 
Duker.  She  was  studying  in  Israel  and  she  and  her  fiance´ were 
killed when their bus was blown up in Jerusalem in 1996. She was 
22 years old. 

The  bus  was  found  to  have  been  blown  up  by  Hamas.  Hamas 
which  receives  funding  and  support  from  the  Iranian  government. 
Now  without  support  from  Iran,  Hamas  and  other  terror  groups 
would not be able to carry out their attacks. 

President Bush has said, ‘‘Money is the life blood of terrorist op-
erations.’’  So,  it’s  stunning  to  me  that  some  American  companies, 
like Halliburton, have conducted business with terrorist states, like 
Iran, in defiance of the law that principles against it. 

Now  I  was  the  first  member  of  the  Congress  to  investigate 
Halliburton’s  dealings  with  Iran.  Some  of  what  we  uncovered  was 
forwarded to the U.S. Office of Foreign Assets Control in the Treas-
ury and has become part of their investigation. 

We  knew  from  a  60  Minutes  piece,  that  the  Halliburton  sub-
sidiary had an office in Dubai and I asked my staff to learn all we 
could about the activities of that office. My staff then obtained cop-
ies of faxes between the Iranians and Halliburton in Dubai. 

And  we  noticed  that  the  Iranians  addressed  these  faxes  to  spe-
cific people at Halliburton, the principal company. What is unclear 
is  who  these  people  were?  Did  they  work  for  the  Cayman  Islands 
subsidiary or the parent company? Were they U.S. nationals? 

One fax was addressed to Ian Gooch and another to a Mr. McIn-
tyre. A third fax was to a Mr. Proctor. Now, I’m going to be asking 
Ms. Williams today to identify what company these people work for 
and what was their national background. 

Another  curious  issue  is  Halliburton’s  January  2005  announce-
ment  that  it  would  no  longer  do  work  in  Iran.  Now  what  Halli-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6

burton didn’t publicize at the time, that just before their announce-
ment,  they  signed  an  arrangement  to  deal  with  Iran  to  help  drill 
their South Pars natural gas field. 

And of course, since he had just inked a multimillion dollar con-
tract  with  the  Iranians,  Halliburton’s  CEO,  David  Lesar,  made 
clear  that  the  company  will  have  to  honor  their  existing  contracts 
with the Iranians, such as this South Pars deal. 

Doesn’t  sound  like  an  honorable  act  to  me.  In  fact,  2  months 
after  Mr.  Lesar’s  announcement  that  the  company  was  leaving 
Iran, NBC news sent out a video crew to Iran and caught an image 
of  this.  This  was  at  Pars  Gas  Field  in  Iran  and  you  see  the  name 
on the jacket, on the uniform of the fellow there, Halliburton. 

Mr.  Chairman,  we’ve  got  to  stop  this  behavior.  That’s  why  I  re-
introduced  my  bill,  Stop  Business  with  Terrorists  Act  last  week. 
The  bill  will  close  the  loophole  that  Halliburton  has  exploited  in 
order to do business with Iran. 

Simply  put,  Iran  sponsors  terrorists.  Their  terrorists  have  killed 
hundreds  of  Americans  including,  Sarah  Duker,  from  New  Jersey. 
Companies  that  help  terrorist  states  generate  revenues  that  are 

helping fund terrorist operations. It’s that simple. 

In  the  Republican  Congress,  I  attempted  to  pass  my  bill  several 
times and we lost narrowly. In fact, on one occasion, we lost a roll 
call  vote  in  the  Senate  by  a  single  vote,  49  to  50  and  I  know  that 
my  amendment  helped  keep  pressure  on  Halliburton  to  announce 
that they were getting out of Iran, but we can’t be fooled. 

Halliburton’s  not  getting  out  of  Iran  because  they  are  suddenly 
a good corporate citizen. They’re not getting out of Iran because it’s 
the  right  thing  to  do.  Halliburton  is  getting  out  of  Iran  because 
they didn’t like the bad publicity that they’re getting, but they plan 
to come back when things cool down. 

In fact, Halliburton CEO, David Lesar, said to the press, ‘‘If more 
of  our  customers  go  to  Iran,  we’re  going  to  return  to  this  market.’’ 
They can’t wait to get out of that place. We can’t wait much longer 
to remove ourselves from places of danger. 

Mr.  Chairman,  we  are  trying  to  legislate  on  this  issue  because 
left to their own devices, companies like Halliburton will follow the 
money, not the morality and I thank you. 

And I wanted to welcome Mr. Bill Thompson here. We’ve worked 

together in the past and look forward to continuing our work. 

Senator DORGAN. Senator Brown. 

STATEMENT OF HON. SHERROD BROWN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM OHIO 

Senator  BROWN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  thank  you  for 
the  series  of  hearings  that  you’re  doing  on  trade  and  on  our  na-
tional and our economic security, like many of us, I certainly appre-
ciate that. 

In  the  post-9/11  world,  U.S.  economic  policy  can  no  longer  be 
viewed  in  a  vacuum  of  bottom  lines  and  profit  margins.  When  we 
open our borders to trade, as we should, we open them to homeland 
security threats. 

It’s imperative that Congress takes proactive steps to ensure that 
our homeland security needs are secured every bit as much as our 
economic  well-being  and  it’s  imperative  that  the  U.S.  Government 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7

stop  rewarding  businesses,  as  Senator  Lautenberg  said,  that  part-
ner with state sponsors of terrorism, such as Iran. We cannot hold 
Iran accountable if U.S. companies help build its economy. 

In  1995,  my  second  term  in  the  House  of  Representatives,  Con-
gress  voted  in  support  of  the  Administration’s  sanctions  on  Iran 
after  that  country  was  found  to  be  in  direct  support  of  organiza-
tions that seek to harm the United States and our allies. 

Over  the  past  several  years,  Iran  has  increased  its  defense 
spending from $4.2 billion in 2003 to $6.6 billion in 2006. More im-
portantly,  in  2005,  IAEA  inspectors  confirmed  that  Iran  had  re-
sumed  uranium  conversion  in  order  to  develop  nuclear  technology 
and to fund these efforts; Iran has been working to develop its en-
ergy  sector,  the  life  blood  of  its  economy  and  the  major  source  of 
its revenue. 

Oil  exports  account  for  roughly  80  to  90  percent  of  Iran’s  total 
export earnings, 20 percent of the total GDP and around half of its 
government’s budget. 

Iran’s oil exports have increased 46 percent over the past 3 years 

to approximately $47 billion last year despite U.S. sanctions. 

While sanctions ban U.S. companies from engaging in the devel-
opment  of  Iran’s  strategic  energy  sector,  both  foreign-based  trans-
national  corporations  and  subsidiaries  of  U.S.-based  firms  have 
supported Iran’s development of its energy sector over the past dec-
ade. 

Since  1999,  foreign,  direct  investment  in  this  sector  has  totaled 
more  than  $100  billion.  Experts  note  that  these  foreign  invest-
ments have the potential to significantly increase Iran’s energy pro-
duction and obviously its revenue potential. 

Over the past several years, while the U.S. has maintained sanc-
tions on Iran, the Halliburton subsidiaries sold a reported $30 mil-
lion in oil extraction equipment to companies working in Iran’s en-
ergy sector. 

Notably  a  Halliburton  subsidiary  sold  oil  drilling  equipment  to 
help  accomplish  this  objective  assisting  foreign  firms  in  Iran’s  de-
velopment. 

It’s been reported that Halliburton recently elected to cease their 
work  in  Iran  and  that  is  a  step  in  the  right  direction,  as  Senator 
Lautenberg  said.  However,  aiding  in  the  development  of  a  country 
that seeks to do America harm is never in America’s best interest. 
It’s  the  responsibility  of  Congress  to  secure  our  Nation.  It’s  the 
responsibility  of  our  government  to  ensure  that  taxpayer’s  money 
in  the  form  of  government  contracts  should  not  go  to  corporations 
that seek to make a profit off rogue governments. 

This should also be the case for companies that move their head-
quarters  offshore.  That’s  why  Senator  Dorgan  and  I  have  intro-
duced  legislation  to  deny  government  contracts  to  U.S.  firms  that 
do  business  with  state  sponsors  of  terrorism  or  that  choose  to  be 
corporate expatriates and move offshore to avoid paying taxes. 

The  actions  of  these  companies  clearly  undercut  our  efforts  to 
stop  the  development  of  weapons  of  mass  destruction  and  prevent 
the  strengthening  of  terrorist  organizations  whose  aim  is  to  harm 
our country. 

We  shouldn’t  help  enrich  companies  that  are  undermining  our 

national security goals. It’s as simple as that. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  the  opportunity  to  join  this  sub-

committee today. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Senator  Brown,  thank  you  very  much.  I’m 

going to introduce the witnesses starting with Mr. Thompson. 

Let me just again say that, the countries, those foreign countries 
that  our  State  Department  has  identified  as  countries  engaged  in 
state-sponsored  terrorism  are  countries  against  whom  our  govern-
ment  has  taken  certain  actions,  but  a  loophole  exists  allowing,  in 
most cases, an opportunity for U.S. companies to, through a foreign 
subsidiary,  continue  to  do  business  with  countries  that  engage  in 
state-sponsored  terrorism  and  the  question  for  this  Congress,  I 
think, is, should we allow that to continue? 

The  answer  to  me  clearly,  is  no  and  so  how  do  we  stop  it  and 

what kind of action do we take? 

Mr.  Thompson  has  been  engaged  in  this  fight  for  some  while.  I 
first  came  to  know  him  by  reading  about  some  of  the  work  Mr. 
Thompson has done. 

He  is  the  Comptroller  of  the  City  of  New  York.  He  is  the  Chief 
Investment  Advisor  to  the  City’s  five  retirement  systems  which 
manage  over,  I  now  see,  $100  billion  in  pension  monies  for  the 
City,  according  to  his  testimony  today  and  he  has  pressured  cor-
porations  that  they  invest  in,  who  do  business  with  state  sponsors 
of  terrorism  to  change  their  policies  and  interestingly  enough,  has 
been quite successful taking a very unusual approach. 

Mr.  Thompson,  thank  you  for  coming  down  from  New  York  and 
being  willing  to  testify  and  telling  us  what  you  have  been  doing 
and how you see this issue. You may proceed. 
STATEMENT OF WILLIAM C. THOMPSON, JR., COMPTROLLER, 

CITY OF NEW YORK 

Mr.  THOMPSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  It  is  definitely  a 
pleasure  to  be  here,  Senator  Brown  and  definitely  my  friend,  Sen-
ator Lautenberg, always a pleasure seeing you, sir. 

I  appear  before  you  today  to  express  my  deep  concern  over  the 
ability of American firms to circumvent the intent of sanctions law 
with  respect  to  nations  deemed  to  be  sponsors  of  terror  by  our 
State Department. 

As Comptroller for the City of New York, I am the Chief Invest-
ment  Advisor  to  the  City’s  five  retirement  systems,  managing  over 
$100 billion in pension funds for the City. 

Our responsibility to protect retiree assets requires a constant ef-
fort to pursue the highest standards of corporate responsibility and 
companies  in  which  we  invest.  We’ve  argued  that  when  companies 
fail  to  consider  the  possible  reputational  or  financial  damage  re-
sulting  from  their  operations  whether  directly  or  indirectly,  they 
put their shareholders long-term investments at risk. 

As  Comptroller,  I’ve  pressured  corporations  we  invest  in  that  do 
business  with  state  sponsors  of  terrorism  to  change  their  policies. 
New York City pension funds have taken on a number of U.S. cor-
porate  giants  who  are  doing  business  with  rogue  nations,  such  as 
Iran and Syria. 

Americans  have  been  hearing  for  years  that  there’s  a  connection 
between  money  and  terrorism,  but  most  didn’t  realize  that  their 
own  investments,  including  their  retirement  nest  eggs  could  be  fi-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

nancing  regimes  that  condone  and  even  encourage  widespread  vio-
lence and bloodshed. 

9

It  certainly  came  as  a  shock  to  New  York  City’s  police  and  fire 
fighters,  who  suffered  combined  losses  of  366  men  and  women  on 
September 11, 2001. Our police and fire department pension funds 
own  some  400,000  shares  in  Halliburton  Company,  valued  at 
roughly $10 million. 

Our other funds had an additional $20 million invested in Halli-
burton. And Halliburton, as we now well know, was doing substan-
tial  business  with  Iran,  a  nation  that  had  been  identified  by  the 
United States Department of State as a state sponsor of terrorism. 
Halliburton  was  not  alone.  Because  of  the  loophole  in  Federal 
law,  other  Fortune  500  companies  like,  General  Electric  and 
ConocoPhillips  were  doing  the  same.  How  did  this  happen?  Our 
government  forbids  American  companies  from  doing  business  with 
or in countries it identifies as terror sponsors. 

However, that ban does not apply to any foreign or offshore sub-
sidiary,  so  long  as  non-Americans  are  nominally  in  control.  This 
loophole was exploited by these companies. 

In  February  of  2000,  Halliburton  opened  an  office  in  Tehran, 
under  the  name  of  Halliburton  Products  and  Services  Limited.  It’s 
a  Cayman  Island-based  subsidiary.  The  alleged  headquarters  for 
Halliburton  Products  and  Services  Limited  was  in  Abu  Dhabi  in 
the Persian Gulf, where it shared office space, fax and phone num-
bers with its United States parent. 

Given  this  evidence,  the  notion  that  Halliburton’s  subsidiary 
was, in any way, independent was laughable. Halliburton owed an 
explanation to thousands of current and retired New York City po-
lice and firefighters, along with the rest of the members of the New 
York City pension system. 

On  their  behalf,  my  office  submitted  a  shareholder  proposal  to 
Halliburton  in  November  of  2002  to  review  the  potential  financial 
and reputational risks of its operations in Iran. Similar resolutions 
were  filed  at  that  time  with  General  Electric  and  ConocoPhillips. 
When Halliburton agreed to such a review, we withdrew our pro-
posal.  Halliburton  subsequently  produced  a  report  that,  rather 
than  addressing  the  broader  risks  inherent  to  doing  business  with 
rogue states, they offered a narrow legalistic explanation of how its 
operations fall within the bounds of the law. 

They  were  clearly  unwilling  to  address  the  broader  implications 
of its activities in Iran for both their shareholders and the country. 
In  January  of  2004,  60  Minutes  aired  a  segment  on  Halliburton 
that mentioned the efforts of my office and raised the public aware-
ness  of  this  issue  dramatically.  The  show  uncovered  new  informa-
tion about Halliburton’s subsidiary. 

For  instance,  the  Cayman  Islands  address  is  just  a  mailbox  at  a 
local  bank  and  barely  that.  When  mail  arrived  there  it  was  re-
routed to Halliburton headquarters in Houston. 

The  attention  from  the  60  Minutes  show  led  ConocoPhillips  to 
announce  within  a  month  that  they  would  not  renew  any  current 
contracts  in  Iran  by  their  foreign  subsidiaries  and  cease  any  new 
business there. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10

As  pressure  mounted  on  Halliburton,  we  filed  resolutions  in  De-
cember  of  2004  with  two  additional  companies,  Cooper  Cameron 
and Aon, to likewise cease their back-door dealings with Iran. 

At the same time we applied pressure to another U.S. based com-
pany,  Foster  Wheeler,  that’s  incorporated  in  Bermuda  and  there-
fore not subject to U.S. sanctions. 

I’m pleased to say that only 3 months later in February of 2005, 
our campaign began to reap greater rewards as GE announced that 
they would let all current contracts in Iran by their foreign subsidi-
aries  lapse  and  cease  any  new  business.  The  next  month,  Cooper 
Cameron,  affirmed  to  my  office  that  its  subsidiary  would  divest  of 
any interest in its Iranian joint venture. 

Within  weeks,  Halliburton  likewise  committed  with  us,  not  to 
pursue  new  business  in  Iran  after  current  contracts  by  their  sub-
sidiary ended. In December of that year, Foster Wheeler also made 
a similar commitment and in January of 2006, the last firm in our 
campaign,  Aon,  announced  it  would  cease  its  back-door  operations 
in Iran. 

Halliburton  originally  indicated  that  they’d  be  completely  out  of 
Iran  by  the  end  of  2007.  I  saw  a  few  weeks  ago  that  they  an-
nounced that they are out for good. 

Ultimately  we  have  to  close  the  loophole  in  Federal  law  that  al-

lows U.S. companies to act through foreign subsidiaries. 

In past sessions of Congress, I’ve been proud to support language 
offered by Senator Lautenberg to do just that. The Lautenberg lan-
guage,  I  believe  is  now  contained,  in  Oregon  Senator  Gordon 
Smith’s Iran Counter Proliferation Act of 2007. I support that legis-
lation  also  and  have  just  found  out  that  the  Senator  has  reintro-
duced it. 

Senator Lautenberg introduced legislation last week, bill S. 1234, 
which  would  achieve  the  similar  purpose  and  I’m  very  supportive 
of that piece of legislation also. 

While  the  companies  we  identified  as  doing  back-door  business 
with  state  sponsors  of  terror  have  all  signed  letters  of  agreement 
with  our  offices  to  end  that  practice,  other  companies  could  choose 
to engage in such dealings tomorrow, or the next day. 

Only  the  passage  of  tough  legislation  can  ensure  that  no  new 
firms  can  take  such  measures.  In  the  meantime  we’ve  begun  the 
process  in  my  office  of  reviewing  how  we  may  be  able  to  influence 
firms with no ties to the United States and are not subject to SEC 
shareholder  proposal  rules  and  we’re  meeting  with  our  trustees 
now to try and work on that. 

After the events of last summer, in which Israeli cities and towns 
were targeted by Hezbollah militia with missiles that many believe 
were  supplied  by  Iran  and  Syria,  our  efforts  to  curtail  the  ability 
of these nations and others to engage in acts of terror are more im-
portant than ever before. 

And at a time when Iran has stated its intention to develop a nu-
clear  program,  we  can’t  ignore  the  risks  proposed  by  that  regime, 
whether  we’re  talking  about  the  development  of  nuclear  weapons 
in Iran or the export of weapons, technology and terrorism abroad. 
For the safety and security of the United States and other peace-
seeking  nations  around  the  world,  institutional  investors  have  to 
continue to insist that the firms they invest in not attempt to wig-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11

gle  out  of  sanctions  against  state  sponsors  of  terror  by  acting 
through subsidiaries not beholden to American law. 

And again, Mr. Chairman, I’d like to thank you and the members 
of this subcommittee and the other members of the Senate for con-
vening  this  panel  on  this  critically  important  topic  and  for  giving 
me the opportunity to present testimony today. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Thompson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF WILLIAM C. THOMPSON, JR., COMPTROLLER, CITY OF NEW 

YORK 

Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Dorgan,  and  honorable  Members  of  the  Subcommittee 

on Interstate Commerce, Trade and Tourism. 

I appear before you today to express my deep concern over the ability of American 
firms  to  circumvent  the  intent  of  sanctions  law  with  respect  to  nations  deemed  to 
be sponsors of terror by our State Department. 

As  Comptroller  for  the  City  of  New  York,  I  am  the  Chief  Investment  Advisor  to 
the City’s five retirement systems, managing over $100 billion in pension monies for 
the City. 

Our responsibility to protect retiree assets requires a constant effort to pursue the 

highest standards of corporate responsibility at companies in which we invest. 

We  have  argued  that  when  companies  fail  to  consider  the  possible  reputational 
or financial damage resulting from their operations—whether directly (through their 
hiring  policies,  for  example)  or  indirectly  (through  policies  of  the  government  with 
which they contract)—they put their shareholders’ long-term investments at risk. 

As Comptroller, I have pressured corporations we invest in that do business with 
state  sponsors  of  terrorism  to  change  their  policies. . . .  New  York  City  pension 
funds  have  taken  on  a  number  of  U.S.  corporate  giants  who  were  doing  business 
with rogue nations such as Iran and Syria. 

Americans  have  been  hearing  for  years  that  there’s  a  connection  between  money 
and  terrorism,  but  most  didn’t  realize  that  their  own  investments,  including  their 
retirement  nest  eggs,  could  be  financing  regimes  that  condone  and  even  encourage 
widespread violence and bloodshed. 

It  certainly  came  as  a  shock  to  New  York  City’s  police  and  firefighters,  who  suf-

fered combined losses of 366 men and women on September 11, 2001. 

Our  Police  and  Fire  Department  Pension  Funds  owned  some  400,000  shares  in 
Halliburton  Co.,  valued  at  roughly  $10  million.  Our  other  funds  had  an  additional 
$20 million invested in Halliburton. 

And Halliburton, as is now well known, was doing substantial business with Iran, 
a  nation  that  had  been  identified  by  the  U.S.  State  Department  as  a  state  sponsor 
of terrorism. 

Halliburton  was  not  alone.  Because  of  a  loophole  in  Federal  law,  other  Fortune 

500 companies, like General Electric and ConocoPhillips, were doing the same. 

How  did  this  happen?  Our  government  forbids  American  companies  from  doing 

business with or in countries it identifies as terror sponsors. 

However,  that  ban  does  not  apply  to  any  foreign  or  offshore  subsidiary,  so  long 
as  non-Americans  are  nominally  in  control.  This  loophole  was  exploited  by  these 
companies. 

In February 2000, Halliburton opened an office in Tehran under the name of Hal-

liburton Products and Services, Ltd., its Cayman Islands-based subsidiary. 

The  alleged  headquarters  for  Halliburton  Products  and  Services  Ltd.  is  in  Abu 
Dhabi in the Persian Gulf, where it shares office space, fax and phone numbers with 
its U.S. parent. 

Given  this  evidence,  the  notion  that  Halliburton’s  subsidiary  is  in  any  way  inde-

pendent of its parent is laughable. 

Halliburton  owed  an  explanation  to  thousands  of  current  and  retired  New  York 
City  police  and  firefighters,  along  with  the  rest  of  the  members  of  the  New  York 
City pension system. 

On their behalf, my office submitted a shareholder proposal to Halliburton in No-
vember  2002  to  review  the  potential  financial  and  reputational  risks  of  its  oper-
ations in Iran. Similar resolutions were filed at that time with General Electric and 
ConocoPhillips. 

When Halliburton agreed to such a review, my office withdrew the proposal. Halli-
burton  subsequently  produced  a  report  that,  rather  than  addressing  the  broader 
risks inherent to doing business with rogue states, offered a narrow, legalistic expla-
nation of how its operations fall within the bounds of the law. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12

Halliburton was clearly unwilling to address the broader implications of its activi-

ties in Iran for both its shareholders and the country. 

In January 2004, the television news program 60 Minutes aired a segment on Hal-
liburton  that  mentioned  the  efforts  of  my  office  and  raised  the  public  awareness  of 
this issue dramatically. 

The show uncovered new information about Halliburton’s subsidiary. . . . For in-
stance,  the  Cayman  Islands  address  is  just  a  mailbox  in  a  local  bank—and  barely 
that.  When  mail  arrives  there,  it  is  rerouted  to  Halliburton  headquarters  in  Hous-
ton. 

The  attention  from  the  60  Minutes  show  led  ConocoPhillips  to  announce  within 
a  month  that  they  would  not  renew  any  current  contracts  in  Iran  by  their  foreign 
subsidiaries and cease any new business there. 

As pressure mounted on Halliburton, my office filed resolutions in December 2004 
with  two  additional  companies—Cooper  Cameron  (now  Cameron  International)  and 
Aon—to likewise cease their back-door dealings with Iran. 

At  the  same  time,  we  applied  pressure  to  another  U.S.-based  company,  Foster 
Wheeler,  that  is  incorporated  in  Bermuda  and  therefore  not  subject  to  U.S.  sanc-
tions. 

I  am  pleased  to  say  that  only  3  months  later,  in  February  2005,  our  campaign 
began to reap greater rewards as GE announced that they would let all current con-
tracts in Iran by their foreign subsidiaries lapse and cease any new business. 

The  next  month  Cooper  Cameron  affirmed  to  my  office  that  its  subsidiary  would 
divest of its interest in an Iranian joint venture. Within weeks, Halliburton likewise 
committed  with  us  not  to  pursue  new  business  in  Iran  after  current  contracts  by 
their subsidiary ended. 

In  December  of  that  year,  Foster  Wheeler  made  a  similar  commitment,  and  in 
January of 2006 the last firm in our campaign, Aon, announced that it would cease 
its back-door operations in Iran. 

Halliburton  originally  indicated  to  my  office  that  it  would  be  completely  out  of 
Iran  by  the  end  of  2007.  A  few  weeks  ago  they  announced  that  they  are  now  out 
for good. 

Ultimately, we must close the loophole in Federal law that allows U.S. companies 
to  act  through  foreign  subsidiaries. . . .  In  past  sessions  of  Congress,  I  have  sup-
ported language offered by Senator Frank Lautenberg to do just that. 

The  Lautenberg  language  is  now  contained  in  Oregon  Senator  Gordon  Smith’s 
‘‘Iran  Counter-Proliferation  Act  of  2007.’’  I  support  that  legislation  and  encourage 
you all to work for its passage. 

While  the  companies  we  identified  as  doing  back-door  business  with  state  spon-
sors  of  terror  have  all  signed  letters  of  agreement  with  our  office  to  end  that  prac-
tice, other companies could choose to engage in such dealings tomorrow or the next 
day. 

Only  the  passage  of  the  Smith  bill  will  ensure  that  no  new  firms  will  take  such 

measures. 

In  the  meantime,  my  office  has  begun  the  process  of  reviewing  how  we  may  be 
able  to  influence  firms  with  no  ties  to  the  United  States  and  are  not  subject  to  the 
SEC shareholder proposal rule. 

I am in the process of initiating a conversation with the Trustees of the five New 

York City pension funds on this matter. 

After  the  events  of  the  summer,  in  which  Israeli  cities  and  towns  were  targeted 
by the Hezbollah militia with missiles that many believe were supplied by Iran and 
Syria, our efforts to curtail the ability of these nations and others to engage in acts 
of terror are more important than ever before. 

And  at  a  time  when  Iran  has  stated  its  intention  to  develop  a  nuclear  program, 
we cannot ignore the risks posed by the Ahmadinejad regime—whether we are talk-
ing  about  the  development  of  nuclear  weapons  in  Iran  or  the  export  of  weapons, 
technology and terrorism abroad. 

For  the  safety  and  security  of  the  United  States  and  other  peace-seeking  nations 
around the world, institutional investors must continue to insist that the firms they 
invest in not attempt to wriggle out of sanctions against state sponsors of terror by 
acting through subsidiaries not beholden to American law. 

I  want  to  thank  Chairman  Dorgan  and  all  the  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  on 
Interstate  Commerce,  Trade,  and  Tourism  for  convening  a  panel  on  this  critically 
important  topic  and  for  giving  me  the  opportunity  to  present  testimony  here  today. 
It has been my very great pleasure to share with you the experiences of my office 

and I look forward to our continued work together on this very important issue. 

Thank you very much.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Thompson,  thank  you  very  much.  We  ap-

preciate your being here and your testimony. 

Next,  we  will  hear  from  Sherry  Williams,  who  is  the  Vice  Presi-
dent  and  the  Corporate  Secretary  of  Halliburton  Company.  I  be-
lieve that you are coming to us from the Houston office, is that cor-
rect? 

Ms. WILLIAMS. Yes, I am. 
Senator DORGAN. Welcome and thank you for traveling to Wash-

ington to come to this hearing. You may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF SHERRY WILLIAMS, VICE PRESIDENT/
CORPORATE SECRETARY, HALLIBURTON COMPANY 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  Chairman  Dorgan  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  here  today 
about the work done by a subsidiary of our company in Iran. 

As  you’ve  heard,  my  name  is  Sherry  Williams  and  I’m  the  Vice 
President  and  Corporate  Secretary  of  Halliburton  Company.  Halli-
burton  was  founded  in  1919  by  Earl  P.  Halliburton  and  he  grew 
with  the  industry  to  build  Halliburton  into  what  it  is  today,  the 
second largest oil field services company in existence. 

Over  the  years,  Halliburton  has  remained  focused  on  the  West-
ern  Hemisphere.  Today  70  percent  of  our  business  is  conducted  in 
Canada,  the  United  States  and  South  America.  Many  of  these 
fields,  however,  are  maturing  and  reaching  a  state  where  they  are 
no  longer  economically  viable.  For  these  reasons  the  company  has 
grown its business in the Eastern Hemisphere as well. 

Work by Halliburton in the Middle East region is not a new phe-
nomenon.  The  company  has  maintained  international  offices  for 
more than 80 years. Over time, Halliburton broadened its business 
opportunities  across  the  region  through  foreign  offices  and  cur-
rently has over 300 subsidiaries. 

One  such  independent  foreign  subsidiary  of  the  company,  Halli-
burton  Products  and  Services  Limited  or  HPSL,  has  done  work  in 
Iran.  HPSL  formerly  known  as  Otis  International  Limited  was  in-
corporated in the Cayman Islands in 1974 and was registered to do 
business in Dubai in 1978. 

Dubai  has  been  HPSL’s  principal  place  of  doing  business  since 
well before the imposition of Iranian sanctions in May 1995. At the 
time  of  the  implementation  of  Iranian  sanctions  and  the  executive 
orders  in  1995,  three  highly  qualified,  major  American  law  firms 
provided advice to Halliburton on the issue of whether independent 
foreign subsidiaries were impacted by the unilateral economic sanc-
tions. 

In  May  1995,  OFAC  hosted  a  meeting  of  many  attorneys  and 
some  company  representatives  concerning  advice  about  the  sanc-
tions law. The advice that came out of that meeting was that inde-
pendent  foreign  subsidiaries,  such  as  HPSL,  were  not  within  the 
bar  of  the  sanctions  to  the  extent  that  they  were  independent  of 
the U.S. parents in undertaking and execution of their business. 

Nevertheless,  Halliburton  announced  in  January  2005  that  it 
would not take any new contracts in Iran. Thus, HPSL has not en-
tered  into  any  new  contracts  or  projects  with  Iran  since  that  date. 
Existing  contracts  needed  to  be  completed  or  the  company  would 
have been sued for breach of contract. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14

The last of the contracts that existed at that time was completed 
this  year.  During  HPSL’s  activities  in  Iran,  decisions  to  undertake 
business  were  made  by  HPSL  Managers  and  Boards  of  Directors. 
Halliburton  Company  did  not  direct  or  facilitate  HPSL’s  activity. 
None of the HPSL Directors, Managers, or employees is a U.S. cit-
izen or a permanent resident alien. 

The  decision-making  authority  for  HPSL  on  a  day-to-day  basis, 
thus  resided  with  local  foreign  management.  Although  Halliburton 
has  grown  its  business  opportunities  in  the  Eastern  Hemisphere, 
it  is  clear  that  the  company  has  more  to  do,  more  work  to  do,  to 
remain competitive. 

Our  biggest  competitor,  Schlumberger,  a  French  company,  is  ex-
tremely active in the region and in other places where we are pro-
hibited from operating due to sanctions. 

Where  Halliburton  is  barred  from  performing  in  a  country  or 
leaves  that  country  due  to  economic  sanctions,  our  international 
competitors pick up the work that we leave behind. 

Schlumberger  has  recently  stated  that  it  intends  to  continue 
work  in  U.S.-sanctioned  countries  and  Schlumberger  is  also  listed 
as a New York Stock Exchange Company. 

Let  me  conclude  by  noting  that  Halliburton  has  been  a  proud 
American  company  for  nearly  90  years  and  intends  to  remain  just 
that.  We  recently  announced  that  our  CEO,  David  Lesar,  has  es-
tablished  an  office  in  Dubai.  The  press  coverage  of  that  fact  was 
incorrect,  leaving  many  with  the  mistaken  impression  that  Halli-
burton is moving its headquarters out of the United States. 

The  company  will  remain  headquartered  in  Houston.  It  will  re-
main a Delaware incorporated corporation subject to all laws of the 
United  States  and  the  Securities  and  Exchange  Commission  and 
Halliburton will remain a Houston company that is proud to be one 
of Houston’s best places to work according to the Houston Business 
Journal. Thank you all very much. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Williams follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SHERRY WILLIAMS, VICE PRESIDENT/CORPORATE 

SECRETARY, HALLIBURTON COMPANY 

Chairman  Dorgan  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  on  Interstate  Commerce, 
Trade,  and  Tourism,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  here  today 
about  the  work  done  by  a  subsidiary  of  our  company  in  Iran.  Your  staff  has  indi-
cated  that  you  are  concerned  about  the  activities  of  subsidiaries  in  certain  parts  of 
the world and whether those efforts should be limited by U.S. laws. 

My  name  is  Sherry  Williams,  and  I  am  Vice  President  and  Corporate  Secretary 
of  Halliburton  Company.  Halliburton  was  founded  in  1919  by  Earl  P.  Halliburton 
who  lived  the  American  dream.  He  worked  the  oil  fields  as  a  young  man  until  he 
discovered  a  revolutionary  way  to  cement  oil  wells,  and  he  grew  with  the  industry 
to  build  Halliburton  into  what  it  is  today:  the  second  largest  oil  field  services  com-
pany in existence. 

Over  the  years,  Halliburton  has  remained  focused  on  the  Western  Hemisphere. 
Today,  70  percent  of  our  business  is  conducted  in  Canada,  the  United  States  and 
South  America.  Many  of  these  fields,  however,  are  mature  and  reaching  a  state 
where  they  are  no  longer  economically  viable.  According  to  some  recent  statistics, 
two-thirds of the known petroleum and gas reserves in the world are in the Eastern 
Hemisphere. For these reasons, the Company has grown its business in the Eastern 
Hemisphere as well. 

Work  by  Halliburton  in  the  Middle  East  region  is  not  a  new  phenomenon.  The 
company has maintained international offices for more than 80 years. More specifi-
cally, Halliburton has had offices in the Middle East for more than 60 years, begin-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15

ning  in  1946  with  a  project  for  Arabian-American  Oil.  The  following  year,  1947, 
marked the Company’s first business in Kuwait. 

Over  time,  Halliburton  broadened  its  business  opportunities  across  the  region 
through  foreign  offices  and  currently  over  300  subsidiaries.  One  such  independent 
foreign  subsidiary  of  the  company,  Halliburton  Products  and  Services  Limited  or 
HPSL,  has  done  work  in  Iran.  HPSL,  formerly  known  as  Otis  International,  Ltd. 
(OIL),  was  incorporated  in  the  Cayman  Islands  in  1974  and  was  registered  to  do 
business in Dubai in 1978. Dubai has been HPSL’s principal place of doing business 
since well prior to the imposition of the Iranian Sanctions of May 1995. 

We  believe  it  to  be  well  established  that  owned  or  controlled  foreign  subsidiaries 
of  U.S.  companies  are  not  subject  to  the  U.S.  trade  sanctions  against  Iran.  Prior  to 
1986,  The  Office  of  Foreign  Assets  Control’s  (OFAC)  sanctions  programs  covered 
U.S. companies, as well as foreign companies that were owned or controlled by U.S. 
companies. Today, only the Cuban sanctions program still has such broad coverage. 
For  programs  instituted  since  1986,  such  as  the  Iranian  Sanctions,  OFAC’s  sanc-
tions  programs  have  clearly  excluded  foreign  subsidiaries  of  U.S.  companies  from 
their  scope,  but  they  have  continued  to  prohibit  their  U.S.  parent  companies  from 
facilitating  or  otherwise  engaging  in  activities  of  those  subsidiaries  involving  sanc-
tioned  countries.  In  other  words,  with  specific  reference  to  the  Iranian  Sanctions, 
mere ownership or control by a U.S. company is not enough to destroy a foreign sub-
sidiary’s independence, and OFAC has never required U.S. companies to divest their 
holdings  in  foreign  subsidiaries  merely  because  they  do  business  with  sanctioned 
countries. Instead, the rules look to actual or required involvement by a U.S. parent 
in  a  foreign  subsidiary’s  operations  to  determine  whether  that  foreign  subsidiary 
has the requisite authority and ability to operate independently. The sanctioning of 
foreign subsidiaries was the topic of at least one piece of legislation in 1995, S. 277. 
While there was discussion of this legislation, it was never enacted. 

At the time of implementation of Iranian sanctions and executive orders in 1995, 
three  highly  qualified  major  law  firms  provided  advice  to  Halliburton  and  other 
companies  now  included  within  Halliburton  to  consider  the  issues  of  whether  inde-
pendent foreign subsidiaries were impacted by the unilateral economic sanctions. In 
May  1995,  OFAC  hosted  a  meeting  of  many  attorneys,  and  some  company  rep-
resentatives. The advice that came out of that meeting was that independent foreign 
subsidiaries,  such  as  HPSL,  were  not  within  the  bar  of  the  sanctions  to  the  extent 
that  they  were  independent  of  U.S.  parents  in  the  undertaking  and  the  execution 
of  such  business.  The  law  firms  also  determined  that  the  sanctions  did  not  apply 
to  wholly-owned  subsidiaries,  such  as  HPSL,  that  are  of  foreign  incorporation  and 
subject to decision-making by non-U.S. citizens. 

Nevertheless,  Halliburton  Energy  Services  announced  in  January  2005,  that  it 
would take no new contracts in Iran. Thus, HPSL has not entered into any new con-
tracts for projects in Iran since that date. Existing contracts needed to be completed 
or  the  company  would  have  been  successfully  sued  for  breach  of  contract.  The  last 
of  the  contracts  that  existed  at  the  time  of  the  announcement  were  completed  this 
year. 

During HPSL’s activity in Iran, decisions to undertake business were made by the 
managers and the Board of Directors. Halliburton did not direct or facilitate HPSL’s 
activity.  None  of  the  HPSL  directors,  managers,  or  employees  are  U.S.  citizens  or 
permanent resident aliens. The decision making authority for HPSL on a day-to-day 
basis thus has resided entirely in local management. 

Before  it  ceased  doing  business  in  Iran,  HPSL  had  about  133  employees.  As  of 
2004, HPSL’s employees included 2 Algerians, 1 Bangladeshi, 11 U.K. citizens, 1 Ca-
nadian, 10 Egyptians, 16 Filipinos, 40 Indians, 13 Indonesians, 33 Iranians, 2 Paki-
stanis, 3 Palestinians, 1 Portuguese, and 1 Sudanese. There were 41 employees who 
lived  and  worked  in  Iran  full-time.  Thirty-three  of  those  local  employees  were  Ira-
nian and 8 were third-country nationals. 

Although  Halliburton  has  grown  its  business  opportunities  in  the  Eastern  Hemi-
sphere, it is clear that the company has more work to do in order to remain competi-
tive.  On  March  14,  2007,  the  Wall  Street  Journal  published  an  article  concerning 
our CEO’s move to Dubai. The article, entitled ‘‘Halliburton Plays Catch Up’’, made 
a strong case that our competition is more deeply entrenched in the Eastern Hemi-
sphere  than  we  are,  and  that  the  Company  will  need  to  ‘‘hustle’’  to  meet  the  com-
petition.  Two  of  our  biggest  competitors,  Schlumberger  and  Weatherford,  are  both 
extremely  active  in  that  region  and  in  other  places  where  we  are  prohibited  from 
operating  due  to  sanctions.  When  Halliburton  is  barred  from  performing  in  a  coun-
try  or  leaves  that  country  due  to  unilateral  economic  sanctions,  it  does  not  mean 
that  the  available  work  in  those  countries  ceases.  Rather,  the  work  continues,  but 
our  international  competitors  pick  up  the  work  we  leave.  Schlumberger  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16

Weatherford  have  stated  they  intend  to  continue  to  work  in  U.S.-sanctioned  coun-
tries. Both companies are listed on the New York Stock Exchange. 

It  should  be  of  some  concern  that  non-U.S.  companies  are  gaining  control  of  en-
ergy  assets  in  countries  where  U.S.  industry  cannot  work,  making  it  far  more  dif-
ficult  for  us  to  reach  our  national  goal  of  energy  security.  It  is  also  troubling  that 
our competition does not always perform with as much respect for the environment 
as Halliburton does. We use literally hundreds of new technologies to find petroleum 
assets,  image  them,  extract  them,  and  transport  them  in  an  environmentally  safe, 
inexpensive manner. 

Let  me  conclude  my  remarks  by  noting  that  Halliburton,  which  employs  45,000 
people  in  nearly  70  countries  around  the  world,  has  been  a  proud  American  com-
pany  for  nearly  90  years  and  intends  to  remain  just  that.  The  Company  is  incor-
porated  in  Delaware  and  its  principal  executive  office  is  in  Houston,  Texas.  We  re-
cently announced that our CEO, Dave Lesar, has established an office in Dubai. The 
press  coverage  of  that  fact  was  incorrect,  leaving  many  with  the  mistaken  impres-
sion that Halliburton is moving its corporate headquarters out of the United States. 
That  is  simply  not  the  case.  The  company  ‘‘Halliburton’’  remains  headquartered  in 
Houston,  where  it  is  proud  to  be  one  of  Houston’s  ‘‘Best  Places  to  Work’’  according 
to the Houston Business Journal.

Senator  DORGAN.  Ms.  Williams,  thank  you  very  much.  Finally, 
we  will  hear  from  Mr.  Victor  Comras,  retired  from  the  U.S.  State 
Department  in  2001,  now  a  practicing  attorney  and  consultant  on 
matters  relating  to  sanctions  and  embargos.  Mr.  Comras,  you  may 
proceed. 

STATEMENT OF VICTOR D. COMRAS, ESQ., ATTORNEY/
CONSULTANT, SPECIAL COUNSEL, EREN LAW FIRM 

Mr.  COMRAS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you  for  inviting 
me  here  to  give  you  my  views  on  the  application  of  U.S.  sanctions 
against Iran. 

I’ve  watched  closely  as  the  United  States  has  sought  to  engage 
other  countries  to  join  with  us  in  applying  increased  pressure  on 
Iran  to  comply  with 
international  counter-proliferation  and 
counter-terrorism  norms.  This  has  been  a  very  slow  and  painful 
process. 

One can understand that there’s a certain reluctance to put sanc-
tions  on  Iran  because  of  the  dislocation  that  that  might  cause  to 
the  world  oil  market  which  could  drive  the  price  of  oil  well  above 
current levels, but one must also weigh the enormous strategic and 
security  risks  posed  by  a  nuclear  armed  Iran  that  supports  inter-
national terrorism. 

Every day the international community stands down, only serves 
to  strengthen  Iran’s  resolve  to  forge  ahead  making  further  con-
frontation increasingly inevitable and at an ever increasing cost. 

Since 1995, we have employed our own sanction laws and regula-
tions  to  seek  to  impair  Iran’s  ability  to  acquire  weapons  of  mass 
destruction  and  to  reduce  the  resources  available  to  them  to  fund 
terrorism  activities.  These  sanctions  have  slowed  them  down,  but 
we have not stopped them. For that we need broader international 
sanctions to bring home to Iran’s leaders that such conduct will not 
be tolerated. 

The  recent  sanctions  measures  adopted  by  the  Security  Council 
fall  well  short  of  these  objectives.  They’ve  made  little  impact,  if 
any, on Iran’s leaders and they do little more than freeze the over-
seas  assets  of  a  few  dozen  Iranian  individuals  and  entities  associ-
ated with their uranium enrichment program. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17

loans  or 

They  do  almost  nothing  to  limit  Iran’s  trade  or  access  to  foreign 
investments, 
financial  and  development  assistance. 
They’ve  left  on  the  table  billions  of  dollars  of  trade  deals  and  in-
vestments  which  undercut  the  international  communities’  stated 
objective of getting to Iran, getting Iran to change course. 

They demonstrate that key countries can continue to lack the po-
litical  will  necessary  to  face  up  to  Iran’s  challenge  and  this  signal 
has been received loud and clear by the current Iranian regime. 

That brings us back to what we can and should do to protect our 
national security and foreign policy interests. I think it is very im-
portant that the Congress and the Administration are now review-
ing our domestic sanctions against Iran to see how they might best 
be  used  and  leveraged  to  apply  pressure  on  Iran  and  those  doing 
business with Iran. 

Let’s  start  with  our  own  business  activities.  Our  own  trade  with 
Iran has grown considerably since President Clinton imposed trade 
sanctions  in  1995,  from  less  than  $500,000  in  two-way  trade  in 
1996, to over $242 million in 2006. In addition, foreign subsidiaries 
of  some  35  different  U.S.  companies  continue  to  remain  active  in 
Iran. 

This  includes  such  companies  as  Halliburton,  Baker  Hughes, 
Smith  International  and  General  Electric.  They  get  around  the 
sanctions  because  the  regulatory  guidelines  here  are  quite  murky. 
The  regulatory  standards  that  apply  to  foreign  subsidiaries  have 
differed from one sanctions program to another. 

The Cuban-North Korean embargos, for example, do apply to for-
eign subsidiaries of U.S. companies. These sanctions were imposed 
under  the  Trading  With  the  Enemy  Act  but  more  recent  sanctions 
including the sanctions on Iran were imposed by Presidential exec-
utive orders issued pursuant to IEEPA. 

These  sanctions  reach  out  only  to  those  foreign  subsidiaries 
which  are  deemed  owned  and  controlled  by  a  U.S.  person.  So  the 
issue  has  become  whether  or  not  there’s  a  real  and  effective  man-
agement  separation  between  the  foreign  subsidiary  and  the  U.S. 
parent. 

Halliburton’s  position  is  that  its  foreign  subsidiary  working  in 
Iran,  Halliburton  Products  and  Services  Ltd.,  is  managed  and  run 
completely independent from the U.S. Halliburton parent. 

Nevertheless  a  public  outcry  against  this  sort  of  activity  has  led 
Halliburton  and  other  companies,  including  GE,  to  announce  that 
they would no longer solicit new business in Iran. This is an inter-
esting  declaration  on  their  part  given  the  fact  that  they  have  long 
claimed  to  exercise  absolutely  no  corporate  control  over  these  sub-
sidiaries. 

Iran’s  banking  sector  is  notorious  for  its  failures  to  comply  with 
international  anti-money  laundering,  fraudulent  and  corrupt  prac-
tices,  and  counter-terrorism  financing  norms.  Yet,  Iranian  banks 
continue  to  have  broad  access  to,  and  to  network  through,  the 
international finance system. 

The  U.S.  Treasury  Department  has  recently  begun  to  scrutinize 
these ties and they have put the international banking community 
on  notice  that  keeping  and  servicing  customers  that  the  United 
States  has  identified  as  terrorists  or  proliferators  could  have  seri-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18

ous  consequences  for  their  ability  to  do  business  in  the  United 
States. 

There  is  also  a  growing  disinvestment  movement  in  the  United 
States  which  is  targeting  international  firms  doing  business  with 
countries like Iran that support terrorism and proliferation. This is 
beginning to have an effect. 

Several  companies  and  international  banks  have  recently  indi-
cated  their  intentions  to  withdraw  from  Iran.  Others  have  cutoff 
Iranian  business  in  dollars.  We  need  to  follow  up  on  these  kinds 
of measures. 

Overall,  U.S.  business  with  Iran  remains  relatively  small  com-
pared to the booming $26 billion two-way trade that has developed 
between  Iran  and  Europe  over  the  intervening  years.  Iran’s  fledg-
ling  commercial  classes  become  very  reliant  on  this  trade  and  it  is 
this  very  commercial  class  that  provides  the  greatest  number  of 
employment  opportunities  in  Tehran  and  Iran’s  other  urban  cen-
ters. 

Actions that threaten to constrict this trade can have a consider-
able  impact  on  the  Iranian  government  and  on  the  economy  and 
this, I think, is essential for us to pursue. This is why it’s so impor-
tant that we continue to press our European friends in other coun-
tries  trading  with  Iran  to  take  the  nuclear  threat  seriously  and  to 
use their own trading leverage with Iran to bring it to a halt. 

The  Iranian  sanctions  target  foreign  companies  that  make  sub-
stantial new investments in the Iran’s oil and gas sector. That sec-
tor  accounts  for  80  percent  of  Iran’s  foreign  earnings  and  over  50 
percent  of  the  government’s  operating  budget.  Despite  its  provi-
sions,  no  sanctions  have  been  applied  to  any  of  the  huge  invest-
ments  now  being  made  to  support  expansion  of  Iran’s  energy  sec-
tor. 

Many argue that imposing sanctions on companies in third coun-
tries  would  be  counter-productive  to  U.S.  business  interests  and 
would harm our ability to convince these countries to cooperate fur-
ther with us vis-a`-vis Iran. 

But  there’s  good  reason  to  believe,  Mr.  Chairman  that  today  in 
the current atmosphere of growing concern with Iran’s nuclear pro-
gram,  the  threat  of  such  action  might  just  lead  companies  in  Eu-
rope,  Japan  and  elsewhere  and  their  governments  to  act  more  in-
tently  in  pressing  Iran  to  change  course.  Thank  you  very  much, 
Mr. Chairman. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Comras follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF VICTOR D. COMRAS, ESQ., ATTORNEY/CONSULTANT, 

SPECIAL COUNSEL, EREN LAW FIRM 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  for  inviting  me  to  share  my  views  on  the  application 
of  U.S.  sanctions  measures  against  Iran.  I  have  watched  closely  as  the  United 
States  has  sought  to  engage  other  countries  to  join  with  us  in  applying  increased 
pressure on Iran to comply with international counter-proliferation and counter-ter-
rorism  norms.  This  has  been  a  very  slow  and  painful  process,  and  it  is  regrettable 
that  so  little  has  been  accomplished.  The  international  community  continues  to  re-
main  reluctant  and  seriously  divided  when  it  comes  to  taking  meaningful  steps  to 
convince Iran to change course. 

One  can  understand  a  certain  amount  of  reluctance  and  caution  on  the  part  of 
many  countries  when  it  comes  to  imposing  sanctions  on  Iran,  given  Iran’s  impor-
tance as a supplier to the world oil market. There are legitimate concerns that sanc-
tions might cause dislocation in the world market which could drive the price of oil 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19

well above current high levels. But, one must also weigh the enormous strategic and 
security risks posed by a nuclear-armed Iran that supports international terrorism. 
Every  day  the  international  community  stands  down  only  serves  to  strengthen 
Iran’s  resolve  to  forge  ahead  making  further  confrontation  increasingly  inevitable, 
and at an ever increasing cost. 

This situation has placed a considerable burden on the United States, which many 
years ago chose to impose unilateral sanctions on Iran to demonstrate our approba-
tion and concern with Iran’s international misconduct. And it has imposed a consid-
erable  burden  on  U.S.  companies.  These  U.S.  measures  sought  to  impair  Iran’s  po-
tential to develop chemical, biological, and nuclear weapons, and to reduce resources 
available to the Iranian government to fund terrorism. These objectives are still far 
from being realized, for we have, so far, failed to convince others in the international 
community  to  follow  this  lead,  and  to  also  adopt  measures  that  will  bring  home  to 
Iran’s leaders that their conduct will not be tolerated. 

I have long advocated using well-considered targeted, economic and political sanc-
tions  to  dissuade  Iran  from  pursuing  its  irresponsible  nuclear  programs.  By  well-
considered  I  mean  sanctions  tailored  to  achieve  specific  objectives  by  having  a  sig-
nificant  impact  on  those  individuals  or  entities,  and/or  specific  segments  of  the  tar-
geted  country’s  economy,  that  are  likely  to  influence  the  course  of  conduct  in  ques-
tion.  I  believe  that  the  credible  threat  or  use  of  such  sanctions  offers  us  the  best 
chance  of  convincing  Iran  to  change  course  without  having  to  engage  in  costly  and 
dangerous  military  action.  I  do  not  believe  that  the  current  United  Nations  sanc-
tions program can achieve these objectives. 

The  recent  sanctions  measures  adopted  by  the  Security  Council  fall  well  short  of 
the measures long advocated by the United States. They have had little, if any, im-
pact  on  Iran’s  leaders  and  do  little  more  than  freeze  the  overseas  assets  of  a  few 
dozen  Iranian  individuals  and  entities  associated  with  Iran’s  uranium  enrichment 
program.  The  most  important  measure  adopted  by  the  United  Nations,  so  far,  has 
been to ban transactions with Iran’s fifth largest bank, Bank Sepah, and to cut that 
bank  off  from  the  international  financial  network.  Bank  Sepah  has  been  closely  in-
volved  in  funding  Iran’s  missile  development  program.  This  is  the  kind  of  action 
that  needs  to  be  adopted  and  replicated  on  a  much  broader  scale.  Beyond  that,  the 
U.N.  resolutions  merely  call  upon  all  countries  ‘‘to  exercise  vigilance  and  restraint’’ 
when  it  comes  to  supplying  sensitive  nuclear,  military  and  dual-use  equipment  to 
Iran,  or  allowing  key  Iranian  military  and  nuclear  industry  officials  to  visit  and 
travel  within  their  countries.  Each  country  remains  pretty  much  free  to  decide  for 
itself which sensitive military equipment and technology they should no longer pro-
vide. These are not obligatory measures. 

The  U.N.  resolutions  have  purposely  stayed  away  from  limiting  commercial  ties 
with  Iran  or  restricting  investments,  loans  or  financial  and  developmental  assist-
ance.  They  leave  Russia  free  to  pursue  an  ambitious  multibillion  dollar  Iran  trade 
promotion  program  and  to  support  Iran’s  Russian-built  nuclear  reactor  at  Bushehr. 
They also leave on the table a substantial number of signed or still to be negotiated 
oil and gas development deals, including a potential $10 billion investment by Royal 
Dutch  Shell  and  the  Spanish  oil  company  Repsol  YFP  to  develop  Iran’s  South  Pars 
field; the construction of a multi-billion LPG export plant by Total; and a $20 billion 
investment by SKS Ventures of Malaysia to produce national gas in Iran’s Golshan 
and  Ferdow  fields.  Chinese  companies  have  also  been  active  in  lining  up  lucrative 
energy  contracts  with  Iran.  China’s  state-owned  oil  trading  company,  Zhuhai 
Zhenrong  Corporation,  has  signed  a  25-year  deal  to  import  some  110  million  tons 
of  liquefied  natural  gas  (LNG)  from  Iran.  And  China’s  state-owned  oil  company, 
Sinopec, signed an agreement in October 2004 that allows China to import a further 
250  million  tons  of  LNG  from  Iran’s  Yadavaran  oilfield  over  a  25-year  period.  This 
huge  deal  also  envisages  substantial  Chinese  investment  in  Iranian  energy  explo-
ration,  drilling  and  production  as  well  as  in  petrochemical  and  natural  gas  infra-
structure.  Total  Chinese  investment  targeted  toward  Iran’s  energy  sector  could  ex-
ceed some $100 billion over 25 years. 

These  are  precisely  the  types  of  investments  and  business  activity  that  the  Iran 
Sanctions  Act,  and  the  preceding  Iran-Libya  Sanctions  Act,  sought  to  discourage  so 
long as Iran continues to violate key international commitments that threaten inter-
national peace and security. These major investment projects undermine U.S. objec-
tives  to  get  Iran  to  change  course,  and  they  eliminate  any  chance  for  the  current 
U.N. sanctions to influence Iran’s leaders. They demonstrate that key countries con-
tinue to lack the political will necessary to face up to Iran’s challenge. And this sig-
nal has been received loud and clear by the current Iranian regime. 

Iran  will  only  change  course  if  and  when  its  leadership  is  convinced  that  the 
international  community  will,  in  fact,  take  the  steps  necessary  to  seriously  impact 
Iran’s  leaders  and  Iran’s  very  vulnerable  economy.  Such  an  impact  on  Iran’s  econ-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20

omy, Iran’s leaders know, would, in turn, seriously threaten the stability and dura-
bility of their regime. 

That  brings  us  back  to  what  we  can  and  should  do  to  protect  our  own  national 
security  and  foreign  policy  interests.  I  think  it  is  important  that  the  Congress  and 
the  Administration  are  now  reviewing  our  domestic  sanctions  against  Iran  to  see 
how they might best be used and leveraged to apply pressure on Iran. 

I  am  pleased  that  this  process  has  already  led  to  changes  in  policy  and  has  al-

ready produced some results. 

Treasury  Under  Secretary  Stuart  Levey  recently  informed  the  Senate  Banking 
Committee of the Treasury Department’s new high level outreach program directed 
at  the  international  private  sector.  Senior  Treasury  Department  officials,  he  said, 
have  met  with  more  than  40  banks  worldwide  to  discuss  the  threat  Iran  poses  to 
the international financial system. The message was clear. By keeping and servicing 
customers  that  the  United  States  has  identified  as  terrorists  or  proliferators,  the 
banks  risk  facing  American  public  scrutiny  and  regulatory  action  that  could  have 
a serious impact on their ability to do business with the United States. An increas-
ing  number  of  international  banks,  financial  institutions,  and  corporations  are  tak-
ing  this  message  seriously  and  are  now  beginning  to  limit  their  exposure  re  Iran. 
Several  international  banks  have  already  indicated  their  intentions  to  withdraw 
from  Iran  completely.  Others  have  cutoff  Iranian  business  in  dollars.  We  must  fol-
low up on these kinds of measures. 

There are a number of additional steps we can take to maximize the leverage ca-

pabilities of the various sanctions measures that we have adopted. 

Following  President  Clinton’s  imposition  of  trade  sanctions  against  Iran  in  1995, 
annual  both-direction  trade  with  Iran  fell  to  less  than  $500,000.  But,  by  2006,  this 
combined trade had again grown to over $242 million ($85 million in exports to Iran 
and $157 million in imports, principally Iranian nuts, dried fruits, carpets, and cav-
iar). This is still quite small compared to the booming $26 billion two-way trade that 
has  developed  between  Iran  and  Europe  over  these  intervening  years.  Iran’s  fledg-
ling  commercial  class  has  become  very  reliant  on  this  growing  trade.  And  it  is  this 
very  commercial  class  that  provides  the  greatest  number  of  employment  opportuni-
ties  in  Tehran  and  Iran’s  other  urban  centers.  Sanctions  that  threaten  to  constrict 
this trade could have a considerable impact on this commercial class, placing further 
distress  on  Iran’s  vulnerable  economy  and  high  urban  unemployment.  And  this  in 
turn will have an impact on Iran’s leaders. 

Ironically,  Iran,  which  is  such  a  major  exporter  of  oil  and  gas,  is,  itself  a  major 
importer  of  gasoline  and  other  finished  petroleum  products.  With  a  daily  consump-
tion  of  more  than  18  million  gallons  of  gasoline  Iran  must  now  import  some  180 
to  200  million  gallons  of  gasoline  per  month.  Rising  petroleum  prices  have  already 
been  the  cause  of  civil  unrest,  and  gasoline  shortages  could  have  a  significant  im-
pact on local business activity and put increased pressure on Iranian leaders to alter 
course. Royal Dutch/Shell is now serving as an advisory partner with Iran in an as-
sessment  project  to  upgrade  Iran’s  refining  capacities.  This  is  the  kind  of  activity 
that should be halted. 

The Iran Sanctions Act targets Iran’s energy, oil and gas sector, and calls for U.S. 
sanctions to be imposed on foreign companies making investments of more than $20 
million in 1 year in Iran’s energy sector. The President is required to impose at least 
two out of a menu of six sanctions against overseas companies violating these guide-
lines.  These  secondary  sanctions  can  be  waived  by  the  President,  however,  if  the 
President  certifies  that  waiving  the  sanctions  is  important  to  the  U.S.  national  in-
terest. Despite continued, and broad investment in Iran’s energy sector, these sanc-
tions have never been invoked. 

Many  argue  that  imposing  sanctions  on  companies  in  third  countries  would  be 
counter-productive  to  U.S.  business  interests,  and  would  harm  our  ability  to  con-
vince  these  countries  to  cooperate  further  with  us  vis-a`-vis  Iran.  But,  there  is  also 
good  reason  to  believe  that,  in  the  current  atmosphere  of  growing  concern  with 
Iran’s nuclear program, the threat of such action might lead Europe, and European 
companies  doing  business  in  both  Iran  and  the  United  States,  to  act  more  intently 
in pressing Iran to change. 

We  have  already  used  third-party  sanctions  against  companies  in  third  countries 
that  have  violated  the  Iran  Nonproliferation  Act.  This  has  included  companies  in 
Austria,  Belarus,  China,  India,  Macedonia,  North  Korea,  Russia,  Spain,  Taiwan, 
UAE,  and  Ukraine.  These  measures  may  well  have  helped  convince  the  inter-
national  community  to  move  forward  on  the  U.N.  sanctions  that  do  target  the  sale 
of  sensitive  equipment  and  technology  to  Iran’s  military  and  uranium  enrichment 
programs. 

U.S.  sanctions  regulations  have  prohibited  U.S.  persons  from  doing  business  di-
rectly or indirectly with Iran since May 1995. This ban also covers brokering trans-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21

actions on behalf of Iran, or engaging in any transaction with a foreign entity where 
there  is  reason  to  know  it  is  intended  for  Iran.  But  what  about  the  dealings  of  for-
eign subsidiaries of U.S. firms with Iran? Here the guidelines are murky. The regu-
latory  standards  applied  to  foreign  subsidiaries  have  varied  over  the  years  and 
under different sanctions and export control programs. The Cuba and North Korean 
embargos,  for  example,  do  extend  to  foreign  subsidiaries  of  U.S.  companies.  These 
sanctions were implemented under the Trading with the Enemy Act (TWEA) which 
provides  broad  enough  authority  to  cover  foreign  subsidiaries.  But,  more  recently 
imposed  sanctions,  including  the  current  Iran  sanctions,  are  based  on  Presidential 
Executive Orders issued pursuant to the International Economic Emergency Powers 
Act  (IEEPA).  The  authorities  under  that  act  are  more  circumspect.  This  is  because 
IEEPA sanctions apply only to ‘‘United States persons,’’ and the Act defines ‘‘United 
States person’’ as ‘‘any United States citizen, permanent resident alien, entity orga-
nized  under  the  laws  of  the  United  States  (including  foreign  branches),  or  any  per-
son in the United States.’’ In line with this definition, the prohibitions in Executive 
Order 12959 of May 6, 1995, issued by President Clinton pursuant to IEEPA reach 
only  to  foreign  subsidiaries  ‘‘owned  and  controlled’’  by  a  U.S.  person,  or  otherwise 
used  by  a  U.S.  person  to  ‘‘evade,  avoid,  or  violate’’  any  of  the  prohibitions  set  forth 
in the executive order. The issue here is whether or not there is a real and effective 
management separation between the U.S. parent and foreign subsidiary, and wheth-
er or not the foreign subsidiary is actually being used by the U.S. person to ‘‘evade 
or  avoid’’  the  prohibitions  against  its  doing  business  with  or  in  Iran.  These  are  dif-
ficult factual issues to determine. 

On  January  11,  2005,  Iran  announced  publicly  that  it  had  just  concluded  a  con-
tract  with  the  U.S.  Company,  Halliburton,  and  an  Iranian  company,  Oriental  Kish, 
to  drill  for  gas  in  Phases  9  and  10  of  South  Pars.  Under  the  deal,  a  Halliburton 
subsidiary registered in the Cayman Islands, but doing business out of Dubai, Halli-
burton Products and Services Limited (HPSL), was awarded a subcontract from the 
Iranian firm Oriental Kish to provide some $30 million to $35 million worth of engi-
neering services per year through Oriental Kish. HPSL had also previously been en-
gaged, since 1995 in several other offshore oil and gas drilling and related engineer-
ing  projects  in  Iran.  In  addition  to  its  Dubai  headquarter,  the  company  reportedly 
also maintained an operational office in Tehran. 

Halliburton’s position is that the transactions involving HPSL do not violate U.S. 
sanctions  since  Halliburton  does  not  exercise  direction  or  control  of  HPSL’s  activi-
ties. They point out that Halliburton Product and Services has no American employ-
ees; that its 5-person board of directors consists of four British citizens and a Cana-
dian citizen, but no Americans; and that the ‘‘day-to-day’’ management and decision-
making  responsibility  at  HPSL  resides  with  the  Management  Director  (who  is  a 
British citizen) and other local management, all of whom reside in Dubai. Neverthe-
less, revelation of this Iran project led to a public outcry. 

In  response,  Halliburton  subsequently  announced  that  all  Halliburton  employees 
would be withdrawn from Iran and that it would end its pursuit of future business 
in Iran, apart from the ongoing Oriental Kish deal. 

Halliburton  is  not  the  only  U.S.  corporation  with  foreign  subsidiaries  working 
with  and  in  Iran.  Some  of  its  main  competitors  in  the  oil  field  industry,  including 
Baker Hughes, and Smith International, also have foreign operations there. General 
Electric’s Canadian, Italian and French subsidiaries have also long been engaged in 
business  deals  with  Iran,  and  there  is  a  Swiss-owned  Caterpillar  dealership  in  the 
heart of Tehran. Some 35 foreign subsidiaries of different U.S. companies reportedly 
are  now  operating  in  Iran.  Several,  including  GE  have  decided  to  follow 
Halliburton’s example. They have announced they also will no longer seek new busi-
ness deals with Iran. This is an interesting declaration given the fact that they have 
long claimed to exercise absolutely no corporate control over these subsidiaries. 

Iran’s  banking  sector  is  notorious  for  its  failures  to  comply  with  international 
anti-money  laundering,  fraudulent  and  corrupt  practices,  and  counter-terrorism  fi-
nancing norms. Yet, Iranian banks continue to have broad access to, and to network 
through, the international financial and banking sectors. The U.S. Treasury Depart-
ment recently began to scrutinize ties of foreign banks with branches in the United 
States  with  Iran.  These  actions  are  being  taken  ostensibly  to  ensure  that  U.S. 
branches  are  not  used  to  facilitate  exchanges  or  transfers  for  Iranian  banks  and 
other entities. The Treasury Department recently fined the Dutch bank ABN Amro 
some $80 million for failing to report the processing of financial transactions involv-
ing  Iran’s  Bank  Melli.  And  since  January  2007  bars  U.S.  banks,  including  U.S. 
branches  of  foreign  banks,  from  facilitating  any  dollar  transactions  for  banks  deal-
ing with Iran’s state-owned Bank Saderat or Bank Sepah. 

I believe additional Iranian banks should be added to the Treasury Department’s 
designated  list  and  that  further  actions  should  be  taken  to  isolate  these  banks  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22

to  assure  that  all  transactions  stemming  from,  or  destined  to  or  through  Iranian 
banks  be  subjected  to  close  regulation  and  scrutiny.  Such  action  would  also  bring 
home to Iran a significant cost for the irresponsible policies it is pursuing. 

As  noted  above,  convincing  foreign  subsidiaries  of  U.S.  companies  to  withdraw 
from  Iran  may  provoke  some  reactions  from  their  parent  countries,  especially  in 
Canada and Europe, who remain very sensitive to what they consider U.S. attempts 
to reach extra-territorially into their bailiwick. But, our task now must really be to 
convince these countries to join with us in putting greater pressure on Iran by cut-
ting back their business dealings with Iran. 

There are some positive signs that the EU leaders are finally coming to the real-
ization  that  the  EU’s  carrot-sweet  negotiating  approach  toward  Iran  must  be 
strengthened  by  the  addition  of  sticks.  EU  Foreign  Ministers  agreed  last  week  to 
move  beyond  the  paltry  Security  Council  measures  and  to  impose  a  more  extensive 
asset  freeze,  travel  ban,  and  arms  embargo  on  Iran.  But,  these  measures  still  fall 
short of impacting Iran’s vulnerable economy. 

We  must  continue  to  press  our  European  friends  and  allies,  and  Japan  to  take 
even firmer measures. This should include getting their companies and financial in-
stitutions  to  refrain  from  entering  into  new  deals  or  making  further  capital  invest-
ment commitments in Iran until Iran complies with the U.N.’s non-proliferation res-
olutions.  Beyond  that,  we  must  use  our  combined  economic  clout  with  Europe  and 
Japan  to  retain  pressure  on  Russian  and  China  not  to  undercut  these  sanctions 
measures. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.

Chairman. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Comras,  thank  you  very  much  for  being 
here. In your testimony, Mr. Comras, you said that there are ‘‘some 
35  foreign  subsidiaries  of  different  U.S.  companies  reportedly  now 
operating in Iran.’’ What’s the source of that number? 

Mr.  COMRAS.  I  take  that  number  from  public  press  reports,  Mr. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Thompson,  how  many  companies  do  you 
think  have  foreign  subsidiaries  now  operating  in  Iran,  how  many 
U.S. companies? 

Mr.  THOMPSON.  We’re  not  exactly  sure.  I  mean,  what  we  have 
done  was  to  take  a  look  and  see  where  substantial  business  was 
being  done  and  that’s  where  we  targeted  companies  as  opposed  to, 
say a bank that had a small branch in Iran, we didn’t want to nec-
essarily  overreact,  but  what  we  had  tried  to  do  was  to  see  where 
the substantial business was being done. 

So,  we’re  not  exactly  sure,  at  this  point,  how  many  companies 
are,  you  know,  doing  real  business  through  subsidiaries  of  Amer-
ican companies. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Is  the  loophole  on  foreign  subsidiaries  a  loop-

hole that applies with Cuba, Mr. Comras? 

Mr.  COMRAS.  There  is  no  similar  loophole  in  the  Cuba  embargo. 
Foreign  subsidiaries  are  covered.  In  many  cases,  OFAC  has  issued 
specific  or  general  licenses  to  cover  the  activities  of  some  of  these 
overseas foreign subsidiaries, but they are covered by the sanctions 
themselves. 

Senator DORGAN. How about North Korea? 
Mr. COMRAS. Same with North Korea, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Is  it  the  case  that  companies  that  decide,  par-
ticularly  I’m  talking  about  American  companies  now,  but  the  com-
panies  that  come  from  other  countries  with  whom  we  are  allied  to 
try  to  bring  Iran,  for  example,  into  a  different  circumstance  with 
respect to nuclear production? 

Is  it  the  case  that  nuclear  weapons  production,  I  should  say,  is 
it  the  case  that  doing  business  with  Iran  by  any  of  these  corpora-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23

tions,  especially  U.S.  corporations,  enhances  and  strengthens  their 
economy? Mr. Thompson. 

Mr.  THOMPSON.  Absolutely.  It  goes  without  saying.  As  I  said, 
whether it is American-based companies through their subsidiaries, 
whether it’s foreign-based companies, these days that are doing di-
rect business, all of these activities enhance their economy and un-
dermine the efforts to sanction countries that support terrorism. 

Senator DORGAN. Does it then, based upon what President Bush 
has said and what we know from intelligence reports and the pub-
lic dialogue, does it help terrorism? 

Mr. THOMPSON. Absolutely. 
Senator DORGAN. It helps fund terrorism? 
Mr. THOMPSON. Yes, it does. 
Senator DORGAN. So, in this case American corporate activity, as 
well  as  corporate  activity  by  our  allies  that  are  investing  in  the 
country  of  Iran  are,  you  believe,  furthering  the  interest  of  ter-
rorism? 

Mr. THOMPSON. Yes, Mr. Chairman, we do. 
Senator  DORGAN.  I  believe,  Mr.  Comras,  you  perhaps  described 
Royal  Dutch/Shell,  $10  billion.  Who  went  through  a  list  of  those? 
Mr.  COMRAS.  Yes,  in  my  written  statement.  Yes,  Mr.  Chairman, 
there are a number of large proposals on the table and investments 
on  the  table  including  Total  building  an  LPG  facility,  including 
Shell  helping  Iran  come  up  with  the  possibility  of  developing  new 
refineries  to  deal  with  its  own  requirements  that  it  imports  fin-
ished products today. 

With respect to China, which has an enormous amount of invest-
ment underway and an estimated $100 billion worth of investment 
that could result over the next 10 to 20 years. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Do  either  of  you  know  whether  there’s  a  way 
for  anyone  to  get  a  list  or  to  obtain  a  list  of  American  charter  cor-
porations doing business with Iran through a foreign subsidiary? 

Mr. THOMPSON. I would believe that there is such a list. I’m try-
ing to remember, one of the individuals that we have worked with, 
last name, Robinson. 

Mr. COMRAS. Roger Robinson. 
Mr.  THOMPSON.  Roger  Robinson.  Roger  has  been  very  helpful  in 
originally  putting  together  a  list  and  we  believe  that  Roger  would 
be  able  to  come  up  with  a  larger  list  and  then  you  can  cull  from 
that  list,  American  companies  that  are  doing  business  and  we  can 
make  sure  that  we  get  him  and  put  him  in  touch  with  your  office. 
Senator DORGAN. Ms. Williams, I didn’t quite understand, is Hal-
liburton still doing business, but has announced that it will not do 
business  in  the  future  beyond  this  contract,  or  are  all  of  your  con-
tracts now completed and you are no longer doing business through 
a foreign subsidiary in the country of Iran? 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  All  of  our  contracts  are  completed  and  we  no 
longer have any further operations. There are some wind-down pro-
cedures  that  are  happening,  but  that  is  not  active  operational 
work. 

Senator  DORGAN.  In  2005,  Mr.  Lesar,  the  CEO,  said  that  when 
he  announced  that  Halliburton  would  no  longer  do  business  in 
Iran, ‘‘if more of our customers go there, we will return to this mar-
ket.’’ Has that changed? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24

Ms. WILLIAMS. Well, it has to change because once we pulled out 
of the Iranian market; we are prohibited from going back in under 
the sanctions law. 

Senator DORGAN. Ms. Williams, your testimony, I believe, is that 
it  was  perfectly  OK  for  Halliburton  to  do  business  in  Iraq  through 
a foreign corporation, excuse me, Iran. 

Let  me  say  that  again,  your  testimony  was  that  it  was  perfectly 
proper  for  Halliburton  to  do  business  in  the  country  of  Iran, 
through  a  foreign  subsidiary  because  it  was  allowed  by  law  and  I 
don’t dispute that. 

Now  you’re  promising  never  to  do  it  again.  Tell  me  the  mindset 
of the corporation. What have you gone through to move from a po-
sition that this is perfectly appropriate. We want to do it. It’s prof-
itable  to  now,  apparently,  agreeing  with  Mr.  Thompson  and  Mr. 
Comras,  that  it  is  in  fact,  strengthening  a  terrorist  state  by  doing 
business in a country like Iran. 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  What  I  would  say  is  that  our  decision  to  pull  out 
of  Iran  was  based  upon  a  number  of  factors  and  no  one  of  them 
was  the  driving  force  in  that.  It  was  based  upon  the  fact  that  it’s 
very  difficult  to  do  business  in  Iran.  It  was  based  upon  the  fact 
that our business there had been diminishing over a long period of 
time and a number of other factors. 

And,  so,  when  we  decided  to  pull  out,  we  had  information  from 
our  legal  team  that  the  decision  would  create  a  barrier  to  re-entry 
and we were comfortable with that from a corporate perspective. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Was  there  any  discussion  about  whether,  from 
a  values  standpoint,  that  doing  business  through  a  foreign  sub-
sidiary with a prohibited country like Iran, was in fact, helping the 
terrorists? 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  I  was  not  a  part  of  those  discussions,  Senator,  so 

I cannot answer that question. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  ask  about  the  Cayman  Islands  sub-
sidiary.  As  you  know,  60  Minutes  did  the  piece,  went  to  the  Cay-
man Islands and you indicated the Cayman Islands subsidiary was 
created in 1974, I believe. 

Ms. WILLIAMS. Yes, it was. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Long  ago.  They  went  to  the  Cayman  Islands 
and discovered there was no one there, apparently just a mail drop 
and then went to Dubai and discovered that the office in Dubai was 
an  office  where  there  was  a  sharing  of  telephones  and  faxes  and 
so on with the Houston company and raised a lot of questions that 
were never really satisfactorily answered for me. 

Tell  us  about  that.  What  can  you  tell  us  about  a  60  Minutes  re-
port that goes to Dubai and incidentally, my understanding is that 
100  percent  of  the  profit  of  the  Cayman  Islands  subsidiary  came 
from  the  activities  in  Dubai  and  doing  business  with  the  country 
of Iran. 

Tell  me  about  the  response  to  the  60  Minutes  report  that  they 
go to Dubai and it appears from that office that it is just an exten-
sion of the Houston office. 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  I  have  not  seen  the  60  Minutes  report,  but  what 
I can tell you is that the Cayman Islands registration is very simi-
lar  to,  I  would  say,  the  registration  of  our  parent  company  which 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25

is  registered  in  Delaware  when  we  have  no  active  business  office 
in Delaware. 

So,  the  registration  in  the  Cayman  Islands  is  perfectly  appro-
priate  under  the  law  and  it’s  not  different  than  how  we’ve  reg-
istered other subsidiaries. 

As  far  as  the  appearance  that  the  Dubai  office,  I  think  that  60 
Minutes,  based  upon  the  transcript  that  I  reviewed  and  I  did  not 
see  the  report,  they  simply  are  incorrect  in  the  assumptions  that 
they made. 

The  HPSL  office  operates  in  a  completely  separate  location  in 
Dubai.  The  Al-Moosa  Tower  location  that  they  went  to  is  a  reg-
istered  office  of  a  subsidiary  with  none  of  the  HPSL  managers; 
none  of  the  Board  of  Directors,  none  of  the  work  from  HPSL  took 
place at that location. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Ms.  Williams,  you  heard  the  testimony  of  the 
other two witnesses and clearly some companies that are chartered 
in foreign countries will continue to do business in Iran and we will 
attempt  to  find  ways  with  our  allies  to  shut  that  down,  but  if  we 
are not successful, one could probably make the case that an Amer-
ican  company  is  prohibited  from  doing  business  in  Iran  and  yet 
their competitors are not. 

Let me ask what Halliburton’s position would be if next week, for 
example,  during  a  mark-up  of  this  Commerce  Committee,  Senator 
Lautenberg  would  offer  as  an  amendment  his  piece  of  legislation 
which I would certainly support. 

Would  Halliburton  be  supportive  of  legislation  that  would  shut 

down the loophole, or close the loophole? 

Ms. WILLIAMS. The Company has not taken any position on that, 
but what I can tell you is that we have followed U.S. law. We will 
continue  to  follow  U.S.  law  and  we  believe  that  it  is  the  role  and 
the  appropriate  role  of  this  body  to  set  U.S.  foreign  policy  and  we 
will  continue  to  completely  comply  with  that,  whatever  Congress 
decides that policy is. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Comras,  do  you  believe  that  having  Amer-
ican  corporations  use  foreign  subsidiaries  to  invest  in  the  country 
of Iran is assisting in the sponsorship of terrorism? 

Mr. COMRAS. Yes, I do, Mr. Chairman. I think that it’s somewhat 
ironic and difficult to understand why we place a burden on Amer-
ican  companies  with  respect  to  sanctions  and  then  go  ahead  and 
allow  foreign  subsidiaries  to  continue  to  compete  with  companies 
that don’t create these foreign subsidiaries. 

If  our  intent  is  to  cut  off  our  own  companies  from  dealing  with 
Iran  and  other  terrorism-supporting  states,  it  seems  quite  logical 
that we would want that to extend as far as possible to anyone that 
we could influence, including using our corporate influence and our 
overall  policies  to  dissuade  others,  including  foreign  subsidiaries 
from  undercutting  the  very  objectives  that  our  sanctions  were  put 
in place for. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Interestingly,  if  the  foreign  subsidiary  is  not 
controlled  by  the  domestic  corporation,  how  does  the  foreign  sub-
sidiary,  when  domestic  policy  and  domestic  politics  in  this  country 
say, ‘‘wait a second, you’re doing business with terrorists, for God’s 
sake. You’re financing terrorism.’’

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26

How  does  a  foreign  subsidiary,  all  of  a  sudden,  make  a  decision 
on behalf of the domestic company, if it is in fact, independent? Mr. 
Thompson, could you answer that? 

Mr. THOMPSON. Difficult to answer, I mean. 
Senator DORGAN. What do you think? 
Mr.  THOMPSON.  It’s  clear  that  those  subsidiaries,  whether  they 
are  independent  or  not,  and  then  all  too  often  and  in  all  too  many 
cases, they aren’t really independent, should not be doing business 
in those countries. It is as simple as that. 

Looking  at  what  the  parent  can  and  can’t  do,  it  is  just  a  back-
door attempt to do business with these countries and I believe that 
legislation should close it off, period. 

Senator DORGAN. Ms. Williams, you’re here. There are other com-
panies  that  could  be  sitting  in  that  seat,  who  have  done  business 
in Iran through a loophole that, in fact, has existed. 

You’re  quite  correct  that  you  have  not  violated  the  law  with  re-
spect  to  intending  to  do  business  through  a  foreign  subsidiary.  I’m 
not  so  sure  that  Halliburton  has  been  on  the  right  side  of  the  line 
with respect to the way that foreign subsidiary was established. 

For example, didn’t HPSL in Dubai use the same telephone num-

ber as Halliburton’s Dubai office? 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  Senator,  I  would  have  to  reiterate  that  that  was, 
the telephone number listed in the telephone book is actually incor-
rect and we have checked into that. 

That  was  a  registration  office  that  was  there  because  at  one 
point we were changing the names from Otis International Limited 
to  HPSL.  The  HPSL  office,  where  all  of  its  operations  and  its  em-
ployees  were,  was  a  completely  separate  location  and  we  would  be 
happy  to  provide  more  detailed  information  on  that  to  you  or  your 
staff. 

Senator DORGAN. Is it the case that 100 percent of the profits of 
your Cayman Islands subsidiary came from Dubai, from the foreign 
subsidiary in Dubai? 

Ms. WILLIAMS. Yes, because the Cayman Islands is a registration 

for HPSL and their operations office is in Dubai. 

Senator DORGAN. And that profit came exclusively from activities 

in Iran? 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  The  profit  for  that  subsidiary  came  exclusively 

from Iran operations, yes. 

Senator DORGAN. Let me just say this. Well, first of all, Ms. Wil-
liams, I appreciate your coming to testify, but I do think that, we’re 
holding  this  hearing  because  I  think  there’s  something  dreadfully 
wrong. 

There  is  something  fundamentally  wrong  and  when  I  read  what 
Mr. Thompson has been engaged in for some long while now, it oc-
curred to me that we ought not to have to ask Mr. Thompson, who 
manages  $100  billion  of  pension  assets  in  New  York  City,  to  carry 
the  burden  of  changing  something  that  is  wrong  with  respect  to 
U.S.  law.  If  we’re  going  to  have  sanctions  against  prohibited  coun-
tries  then  we  ought  not  to  have  exceptions  to  it  and  we  ought  not 
have  someone  going  around  the  sanctions  through  a  loophole  that 
says we still want to do business with a terrorist state. 

No company should be doing that, that is chartered in this coun-

try and we need to pass legislation, post haste, to address it. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27

So,  I  appreciate  my  colleagues  being  here.  Senator  Lautenberg. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks very much, Mr. Chairman. One of 
the  things  I  wanted  to  straighten  out,  Ms.  Williams,  is  you  said 
that the building, the Al-Moosa Tower, was no longer a place of oc-
cupancy by any Halliburton facility. 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  No,  Al-Moosa  Tower  is  currently  still  a  location 

for a Halliburton company. It is not the location for HPSL. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  I  hold  here  a  fax,  which  I’m  happy 
to  share.  It’s  addressed  to  Halliburton  Products  and  Services,  Al-
Moosa Towers, Dubai. Now, they were working out of that building. 

Ms. WILLIAMS. There was a registration for that building, yes. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Halliburton  Products  and  Services  did  at 

some point work out of that building? 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  Senator,  I’m  not  sure  about  that  answer,  but  I’d 

be happy to provide it later. 

contradicts your statement. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  would  appreciate  it  because  it  directly 

not? 

Do  you  know  the  names  Ian  Gooch,  Mr.  Proctor,  Mr.  McIntyre, 

are they familiar names to you? 

Ms. WILLIAMS. No, they are not. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Well, this table that was introduced intro-
duces their names as recipients of the request for contract from the 
Iranian  company  and  they  were  addressed  as  such  because  they 
represent  Halliburton  and  they  wanted  to  be  in  touch  with  them. 
Now,  so  you  don’t  know  whether  they  work  for  Halliburton  or 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  Senator,  I  have  never  seen  those  faxes  and  I  do 
not  recognize  those  names.  However  if  I  could  get  copies  of  the 
names and faxes from your staff I would be happy to do an appro-
priate investigation into that. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. We’ll give them to you, Ms. Williams. 
See,  I  wasn’t  sure  if  the  Chairman  reviewed  process.  Let  us  be 
clear.  Profits  earned  by  a  subsidiary,  wholly  owned  by  Halliburton 
would eventually accrue the Halliburton’s profit picture. 

Ms. WILLIAMS. I’m sorry, is that your question? 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Ms. WILLIAMS. Yes, it would. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  They  would.  OK.  So  Halliburton  would  be 
the beneficiary of these operations, assuming that they were profit-
able, fair to say? 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  Any  operations  earned  from  any  subsidiary  does, 

you know, is accounted for in our books, yes. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  wonder  if  there’s  any  challenge  to  con-
science if the rules are such that the company can’t do business di-
rectly,  but  if  the  structure  is  developed  such  that  profits  pass 
through. 

Is  there  no  responsibility,  I  don’t  want  to  put  you  on  the  spot, 
I think you’re in a very delicate position, and I admire your willing-
ness  to  be  here,  but  when  I  see  the  sleight  of  hand  that  goes  into 
creating  this  subsidiary  and  we  see  a  picture  of  a  Halliburton  em-
ployee  in  an  Iranian  situation  and  we  get  these  requests  for  pro-
posals addressed to Halliburton employees and that we don’t know 
who these people are. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28

We  know  that  they’re  Halliburton  employees  and  they’re  sta-
tioned  in  Dubai  and  I  just  wondered  whether  you  knew  who  they 
were. 

Now, something else that you said, Ms. Williams that is that you 
used a Delaware registration as a comparison, the consequences of 
a Delaware license for a company to do business, really it may hurt 
a  particular  state  or  community  but  it  certainly  doesn’t  imperil 
American  lives  and  when  you  talk  about  well,  if  we’re  not  there, 
competition  will  take  the  business.  At  what  point  do  we  say  that 
we  ought  not  to  be  doing  things  that  endanger  our  people,  simply 
because competition will be there. 

There  were  other  companies  doing  business  in  Libya  and  we 
didn’t  worry  about  them  doing  business  there  when  we  refused  to 
do  business  there.  So,  I  don’t  frankly  agree  with  you  with  the  rea-
soning that you presented. 

Your  CEO,  David  Lesar,  announced  in  January  2005,  we’re  get-
ting out of Iran, however, just before that we all heard that a mul-
timillion dollar deal with the Iranians was there to help them drill 
for natural gas. 

Do  you  see  any  conflict  between  signing  the  contract  with  the 
Iranian  company  with  the  subsidiary  and  then  making  a  decision 
that  they  would  get  out  of  any  further  agreements?  I  think  the 
Chairman asked questions alluding to that situation. 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  Senator,  in  an  effort  to  fully  answer  your  ques-
tion, can I consult my colleagues on one thing about your question? 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Please, please do. 
Ms. WILLIAMS. I would like to give you the most complete answer 

possible so I appreciate you letting me get a clarification. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Absolutely. 
Ms. WILLIAMS. What you’re referring to is a proposal that started 
in  negotiations  in  early  2004,  which  was  over  a  year  before  Mr. 
Lesar made the announcement that we were pulling out of Iran. It 
was  a  consortium  deal  in  which  the  portion  that  we  were  bidding 
on in 2004 was very small. 

What I can tell this committee is that contract was never signed. 
It  never  came  to  fruition  and  so  at  the  time,  Mr.  Lesar  made  the 
announcement  there  was  no  contract  that  we  had  signed  to  con-
tinue with that deal. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Is  Halliburton  still  under  investigation  by 
the U.S. Attorney in the Southern District of Texas for possible vio-
lations of terror sanctions law? 

Ms. WILLIAMS. I think that the investigation is ongoing. We have 
responded  to  all  of  the  inquiries  from  the  Department  of  Justice 
and  we  did  that  as  late  as  2005  and  for  the  past  24  months  we’ve 
heard  no  additional  information  from  them.  We  have  cooperated 
fully. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Halliburton  employees  testified,  did  they 

testify before the Grand Jury? 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  At  this  point  I  do  not  have  that  information,  but 

I would be happy to get it and provide it to you. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Please, let’s see if they received subpoenas 

in this case. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29

Did the decision in January 2005 have anything to do related to 
the  U.S.  Attorney’s  criminal  investigation  of  Halliburton’s  activi-
ties? 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  The  decision  in  2005  was  based  upon  a  number 
of  factors.  I  was  not  participating  in  those  conversations  so  I  can 
not tell you with any certainty of whether that issue was discussed, 
but  I  do  know  that  there  were  a  number  of  issues  that  went  into 
the final decision on the withdrawal from Iran. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Thompson,  you  said  that,  I  think  it 

was the fire department pension. 

Mr. THOMPSON. Fire and police department pension funds. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Police  and  fire,  owned  some  400,000 

shares in Halliburton Company. 

Mr. THOMPSON. Yes, at that point. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Were  you  aware  of  the  fact  that  the  Vice 
President  of  the  United  States  had  more  than  that  on  option,  over 
400,000 shares on option? 

Mr. THOMPSON. I was not, Senator. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes,  he  was.  Do  you  know  what  the  final 

exercise date is on those options? 

Mr. THOMPSON. I don’t. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  do.  It’s  2009,  after  its  full  service  to  the 

U.S. Government, all the way through there. 

Mr. Thompson, given your work and research, do you think that 
companies  will  stop  doing  business  with  terrorist  nations  on  their 
own or is legislation needed? 

Mr.  THOMPSON.  Unfortunately,  it’s  become  clear  over  a  period  of 
years that while things may be legal, it doesn’t mean that they are 
ethical  and  I  believe  that  unless  you  close  the  loophole,  companies 
will continue to attempt to do business in back-door fashions. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you  very  much.  Mr.  Chairman, 

thank you. 

Senator DORGAN. Senator Brown. 
Senator  BROWN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you  all  for 
being  here.  I  appreciate  your  willingness  to  be  here  and  your  can-
dor with us. 

Ms. Williams, I look at this; I’m not a member of this Committee. 
I’m  new  to  the  Senate.  I  was  in  the  House  for  14  years  and  I’m 
just  sort  of  amazed  by  how  all  of  this  has  unfolded  in  the  last  5 
years or so. 

Your  company  is  one  that  has  had  billions  of  dollars  in  govern-
ment contracts. Your company has made settlements with the gov-
ernment, I believe because of overcharges on services to our troops, 
often  with  non-delivery  to  the  troops,  often  under  performance  on 
those  contracts.  Your  company  has  had  millions  of  dollars  in  con-
tracts with terrorist states building up their economy. 

The Vice President of the United States, former executive of your 
company, draws a pension three times what the average American, 
middle  class  American  earns  in  a  year.  Now  you  pretty  much  say 
and  the  Republican  Congress  has  pretty  much  done  nothing  about 
any of this, now you say three things today. 

You  say  well,  the  company  was  a  subsidiary.  You  say  we,  the 
company acted perfectly appropriately under the law and then you 
said besides the French do it too. The French company seems even 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30

worse.  Do  you  or  do  other  top  executives  at  Halliburton  really  un-
derstand why the American public gets so angry about this? 

Ms. WILLIAMS. I would say that we, the company has been under 
the  spotlight  for  a  long  time.  We  see  what’s  printed  in  the  press 
about us and we listen to what our own employees have to say and 
I think that from a purely sympathetic standpoint we can look and 
say,  based  upon  the  information  that  the  American  public  gets 
that,  you  know,  they  have  a  right  to  their  opinions  and  to  voice 
their opinions about our company in any way they see fit. 

Senator  BROWN.  Based  on  the  information  the  American  public 
gets,  but  the  information  is  factual,  huge  government  contracts, 
overcharging  of  those  contracts,  non-delivery  and  under  perform-
ance in those contracts. 

When it affected American troops in the field, the Vice President, 
getting  a  huge  pension  from  your  company,  dealing  with  terrorist 
states,  all  of  those  things  are  not  just,  you  almost  say  it 
dismissingly,  that’s  just  what  the  American  public  hears.  Well, 
those are facts that the American public hears. 

In  your  response  to  Chairman  Dorgan  about  why  you  sort  of 
moved out of Iran finally, albeit, reluctantly. None of those answers 
had anything to do with patriotism or anything to do with the val-
ues that I think our country holds dear. 

They  were  all  sort  of  business  decisions  and  I  understand  your 
business, but I understand that most businesses in our country op-
erate  at  least  under  some  modicum  of  values  and  patriotism  and 
I just have been disappointed in all of those answers, but, more so, 
I  appreciate  your  courage  being  here.  I  don’t  appreciate  the  com-
pany’s behavior, the company for which you work. 

I  guess  I’ll  shift  to  Mr.  Comras  for  a  moment.  You  said  that 
North  Korea  and  Cuba  are  included  in  the  Trading  with  the  En-
emies Act. Should we, as we figure all this out, working on Senator 
Lautenberg’s  bill,  the  bill  that  Senator  Dorgan  and  I  have  intro-
duced, how do we improve the current sanction regimes? 

Do  we  put  it  under  the  Trading  with  the  Enemies  Act?  Is  that 
something we should expand? Should we do it through other kinds 
of  legislation?  Give  us  and  you  too,  Mr.  Thompson,  your  rec-
ommendation, specifically on what we should do. 

Mr.  COMRAS.  I  think  there  are  many  courses  of  action  that  can 
be  taken,  including,  to  clarify,  under  IEPPA,  the  coverage  and  the 
definition of U.S. persons and how that might relate to another line 
that  is  also  in  that  Act.  As  well  as  in  the  Executive  Order  about 
avoiding  or  evading  the  sanctions,  which  is  also  illegal  for  a  U.S. 
person to do by using a foreign entity. 

So,  there  are  ways  to  look  closely,  even  at  the  existing  authori-
ties and to reinterpret them, to clarify them and various measures 
and acts in the legislature, but I do think it is a loophole that does 
need to be dealt with. 

In  part  the  loophole  does  have  a  rationale.  That  rationale,  some 
of  us  recall  from  the  time  of  the  gas  pipeline,  when  some  foreign 
countries were very upset with what they viewed as the extra-terri-
torial extension of U.S. authorities. 

And  so  we  do  walk  something  of  a  line  here,  but  I  think  in  the 
current context of Iran, it is very essential that we get to that line 
and  that  line,  I  think,  clearly  does  include  foreign  subsidiaries  of 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31

U.S.  companies  where  the  profits  are  going  to  the  U.S.  company 
and  where  it  is,  ultimately,  the  corporate  decision  of  the  parent 
rather than the subsidiary with respect to what its conduct is, and 
I think we see that in the parent being able to call it off and saying 
that no longer will these subsidiaries do this kind of business. 

So,  I  think  that  in  this  kind  of  context  we  should  make  it  clear 
that a foreign subsidiary that is owned and that is corporately con-
trolled  by  the  parent  should  be  covered,  not  a  question  of  day  to 
day management, but day to day who can make that ultimate deci-
sion  and  if  that  ultimate  decision  does,  as  in  fact  it  does,  reside 
here  in  the  United  States  by  a  U.S.  person  then  I  think  it  should 
be obligatory on them to fall in line with the same measures as any 
other U.S. corporation would fall into. 

Senator BROWN. Mr. Thompson, anything to add to that? 
Mr. THOMPSON. Times have changed. The world has changed and 
the  fight  against  terrorism  is  one  that  now  goes  into  corporate 
board rooms around this country and around the world. 

We need to close the loopholes now and opportunities for compa-
nies  to  do  business  in  any  fashion  in  any  U.S.-based  company, 
whether it is directly or indirectly, those loopholes should be closed. 
We need to choke the flow of dollars off to some of these regimes 
and  some  of  these  countries.  Those  dollars  come  back  to  haunt  us, 
and  are  used  against  us  in  other  ways.  So  we  need  to  close  those 
loopholes now and if it is in any way possible. 

Senator BROWN. Thank you. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Chairman, may I? 
Senator DORGAN. Senator Lautenberg. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks. If I could indicate something here 
that in the Halliburton directory, they list KBR as a division of the 
American  company,  a  division.  They  list  an  address  in  Al-Moosa 
Tower, tenth floor and they have a designee. No, that’s the address, 
I’m sorry, on the tenth floor. 

There’s  some  conflict  here  as  to  whether  or  not  the  testimony 
was  accurate  as  to  whether  or  not  there  was  a  company,  a  Halli-
burton  office  and  as  well  as  the  subsidiary  office,  fully  owned  sub-
sidiary office that was in this building and I think you said in your 
testimony there was no such thing. 

Ms. WILLIAMS. There was a registration office and the HPSL had 
a  separate  office,  however,  as  I  indicated  earlier,  Senator,  I’ll  be 
happy to track down this information and provide it to you so you’ll 
be clear on those issues. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  would  appreciate  it.  Thanks,  Mr.  Chair-

man. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Ms.  Williams,  I  started  to  say  a  bit  ago,  you 
are  not  the  only  corporation.  You  represent  the  Halliburton  Com-
pany.  You’re  a  senior  executive  there.  Other  corporations  could 
have sat in your chair having to answer the same questions. 

You happened to be here and you know yourself that Halliburton 
has  become  a  rather  high  profile  company  with  respect  to  con-
tracting and a whole range of issues and I’ve been involved in rais-
ing  those  questions.  I  appreciate  your  coming  to  be  willing  to  an-
swer questions. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32

I  must  tell  you,  I  personally  think  that  corporate  decisions,  with 
respect  to  these  issues,  have  to  contain  more  than  just  a  business 
sense, just the numbers, just the issue of profitability. 

They  also,  it  seems  to  me,  if  they  are  given  life  by  a  corporate 
charter  in  the  country  and  that  is  what  gives  life  to  a  corporation, 
they  also  must,  it  seems  to  me,  answer  the  question,  is  this  the 
right thing to do? Is this what our company wants to be doing and 
I think, not just with respect to your corporation, but a good many 
others, too many others. 

They  apparently  decided,  you  know  what,  profit  really  trumps 
the other questions or perhaps they won’t even ask the other ques-
tions and I think Mr. Thompson has. 

Mr. Thompson has started a national discussion and a role as an 
activist,  an  equity  shareholder.  We  want  to  ask  these  companies 
various questions. The thing that I don’t understand, very frankly, 
one of the reasons I wanted to hold this hearing—In addition to the 
fact  that  my  colleague,  Senator  Lautenberg  has  introduced  legisla-
tion,  my  colleague,  Senator  Brown  has.  I  have  never  quite  under-
stood  how  it  could  be  that  a  foreign  subsidiary  would  not  nec-
essarily have to be under the control of a parent corporation. 

The definition of that, the way it is made to sound by the compa-
nies  that  are  doing  business  with  Iran  are  well,  we’re  doing  busi-
ness with Iran, but we’re doing business through this company over 
in Dubai or wherever and we have no control over that. 

Well,  of  course,  that’s  absurd  on  its  face.  The  parent  company 
will  always  have  control,  otherwise  it  wouldn’t  have  the  foreign 
subsidiary.  So,  it  is  the  creation  of  a  fiction  here  that  has  allowed 
some  companies  to  do  business  with  a  terrorist  state,  a  state  that 
is,  with  respect  to  Iran,  sponsoring  acts  of  terrorism,  funding  acts 
of terrorism. 

And I personally believe it’s long past the time for us to say we’re 
going  to  stop  it.  We  won’t  rely  on  Mr.  Thompson  to  stop  it.  We 
won’t  rely  on  companies  to  decide  by  themselves  that  we  will  stop 
it. We’ll just say it’s a matter of law. 

We’re  going  to  put  an  end  to  this  fiction.  No  more  trading  with 
the  enemy.  No  more  creating  foreign  subsidiaries  for  the  purpose 
of  engaging  in  a  business  for  a  purpose  of  profit  in  the  country  of 
Iran. 

And so that’s why we hold this hearing. I’ve not been able to rec-
oncile  any  plausible  rationale  for  this  fiction  that  somehow  foreign 
corporations  are  not  controlled  by  the  domestic  corporate  entity 
that owns them. 

Does  anyone  want  to  respond  to  that?  Is  there  any  way  for  me 
to  understand  that  allowing  the  creation  of  a  corporate  structure 
that  is  a  foreign  subsidiary,  does  not  in  fact,  belong  to  the  parent 
company  and  is,  in  fact,  controlled  by  the  parent  company?  Can 
anybody disabuse me of that fiction? 

Senator LAUTENBERG. May I add, Mr. Chairman, that would vio-
late the laws of the country as well. The structuring of the corpora-
tion,  is  a  device  that,  obviously,  is  used  to  the  detriment  of  our 
country  and  as  a  matter  of  fact,  I  think,  Mr.  Comras,  you  said  it 
correctly.  What  does  it  do  to  encourage  other  countries  to  pay  at-
tention to this? We lose our credibility and we lose our standing at 
the same time. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33

Senator  DORGAN.  Let  me  say,  first  of  all,  I  welcome  the  an-
nounced  decision  by  Halliburton  that  it’s  no  longer  going  to  do 
business in Iran through a foreign subsidiary. 

I did not know until you indicated to me now that that business 
has  virtually  ceased,  except  for  as  you  indicate,  some  clean-up  de-
tails of a previous contract, but at this point that it ceased. 

My  understanding  is  that  other  corporations  have  made  similar 
announcements  and  I  welcome  those  announcements  as  well  be-
cause I think that moves us in the right direction and I think, per-
haps, it does say to other companies that are still involved in doing 
business  in  Iran,  they  might  ought  to  take  a  really  close  look  at  it 
because there’s a lot of concern here in the U.S. Congress and with 
the American people that this is not good business. 

It  is,  in  fact,  undermining  an  important  national  goal  and  that 
is  to  try  to  prevent  the  country  of  Iran  from  acquiring  nuclear 
weapons,  prevent  the  country  of  Iran  from  sponsoring  terrorism, 
from funding terrorist activities. 

That’s a noble national goal that we have that, I think, is under-
mined  by  those  companies  that  will  still  be  doing  business  in  the 
country of Iran. 

I  intend  to  work  with  my  colleagues  and  others  to  move  legisla-
tion.  We  won’t  be  having  these  discussions  in  the  future  because 
we will have cut off the opportunity to do that. 
Mr. Thompson, you wanted to say something? 
Mr.  THOMPSON.  Just,  Senator,  that  I  would  agree  that  there  is 
attention  that  has  been  focused  in  the  last  few  years  that  it  has 
forced  a  number  of  companies  to  cease  doing  business  in  Iran  and 
in other nations like Syria. 

It is important to pass legislation because when that attention fo-
cuses  in  other  places,  if  we  don’t  pass  legislation,  there  will  be 
other  companies  who  will  fill  the  void  through  subsidiaries  and 
come back and attempt to do business. 

So the passing of legislation and strong legislation that will pre-

vent it, period, is the way to go. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Thompson,  thank  you  for  you  work.  Mr. 

Comras, thank you. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Just  one  last  thing,  Mr.  Chairman.  And 
that  is  to  quote  Mr.  Lesar  when  he  said  to  the  press  and  you’ve 
confirmed this, Ms. Williams. ‘‘If more of our customers go to Iran, 
we will return to this market.’’

So the only guide is whether or not there’s business there it has 

little to do with the law, or ethics of this decision. 

Senator DORGAN. Ms. Williams, I think you’ve responded to that 
earlier  in  one  response.  Did  you  want  to  respond  again  to  that 
issue? 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  I  would  just  say  that  is  the  statement  Mr.  Lesar 
made; however, we have always followed the law. We will continue 
to do so and whatever this body decides is the United States appli-
cable law and the United States foreign policy. We will follow that. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  hope  you  get  to  be  the  CEO  of  Halli-

burton. We would be better off. Thank you. 

Senator DORGAN. To follow up on that point because I was going 
to say thank you for coming and giving the company credit for say-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34

ing,  ‘‘we’re  leaving  and  we’re  not  going  to  be  doing  business  in 
Iran.’’

If his statement 2 years ago was a statement if that’s where the 
business goes, we will be back. My assumption has been their most 
recent statement is we have decided we’re not going to do business 
with  Iran  and  my  assumption  was  that  statement  was  made  be-
cause  they  understand  that  is  not  something  that  they  want  the 
company  to  be  involved  in  for  the  reasons  we’ve  described  today. 
I  don’t  quite  understand  your  answer  because  you  will  do  what 
the law requires, but the law would, unless changed, the law would 
allow  you  to  continue  to  do  business  in  Iran.  My  hope  would  be 
that  your  statement,  the  corporate  statement,  is  that  you  have  de-
cided that is not the good thing, a wise thing or in concert with this 
country’s interests to do. 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  Senator,  what  I  would  say  to  that  is  when  we 
made the decision to pull out of Iran, we recognized that we would 
not  be  able  to  go  back  into  that,  or  go  back  into  that  country  even 
under the current law. 

So, as it stands our decision to pull out of Iran was one that was 
made  with  the  understanding  of  the  consequences  that  the  law 
would  not  allow  us  to  go  back  in.  So,  the  current  law  would  not 
allow us to go back in. 

If  you  all  decide  to  change  the  law  in  some  way,  we  will  follow 

that law and continue to do so. 

Senator DORGAN. Well, Ms. Williams, thank you for coming, oth-
ers  would  not.  We  appreciate  your  corporation  sending  you  to  rep-
resent their views. 

Mr.  Thompson,  thank  you  for  your  continuing  work.  I  think 
you’ve  stimulated  a  great  deal  of  interest  in  the  Congress  on  this 
issue. 

Mr. Comras, thank you for your many years of service. 
This hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 3:30 p.m. the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X

SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION FROM HALLIBURTON COMPANY 

1. HPSL Office in Dubai 

a.  Senator  Lautenberg  displayed  three  FAXs  at  the  hearing.  Two  of  the  three 
were sent in 1997 and one probably was sent in 1998 but all three are only partially 
legible.  His  request  was  that  he  wanted  to  know  for  whom  the  following  people 
worked and whether they are U.S. nationals.

Mr. Proctor 
Mr. McIntyre 
Mr. Gooch
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Did  they  work  for  the  Cayman  Islands  subsidiary  or  the 
parent  company?  Were  they  U.S.  nationals?  One  fax  was  addressed  to  Ian 
Gootz, another to a Mr. McIntyre, a third fax was to Mr. Procker—Proctor.

The  three  individuals  mentioned  in  the  FAXs  and  the  subject  of  Senator  Lauten-
berg’s question are not U.S. citizens. Messrs. Proctor and Gooch were both employed 
by Halliburton Products and Services, Limited (HPSL) at the time of the FAXs. We 
believe  that  Mr.  McIntyre  was  likely  working  for  a  U.K.  subsidiary  of  Halliburton 
at  the  time  of  the  FAXs.  Mr.  McIntyre  had  been  at  one  time  the  manager  of  Otis 
International,  Limited  (OIL)  before  it  became  HPSL.  According  to  the  handwritten 
note on the FAX furnished by Senator Lautenberg, the correspondence was actively 
being  transmitted  on  or  about  February  5,  1998.  Our  records  indicate  that  Mr. 
McIntyre was the Corporate Secretary of HPSL on that date.

b.  What  was  the  location  of  the  HPSL  operating  office  (not  registration  office)  in 

Dubai?

the  work 

for  HPSL 

Ms.  WILLIAMS.  The  Al  Mossa  Tower  location  that  they  went  to  is  a  registered 
office  of  a  subsidiary,  but  none  of  the  HPSL  managers,  none  of  the  Board  of 
Directors  and  none  of 
that 
location . . . The  HPSL  office,  where  all  of  its  operations  and  its  employees 
were  a  completely  separate  location,  and  we  would  be  happy  to  provide  more 
detailed information on that to you or your staff.
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  No,  the  Halliburton  Products  and  Services  did  at  some 
point work out of that building.
Ms.  WILLIAMS.  Senator,  I’m  not  sure  about  that  answer.  But  I’d  be  happy  to 
provide it later.
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  would  appreciate  it  because  it  directly  contradicts  your 
statement.

took  place 

from 

The  registered  Dubai  address  for  HPSL  was,  has  been,  and  remains  at  Al  Moosa 
Tower.  Since  1994,  HPSL  has  maintained  operations  facilities  in  the  following 
Dubai locations:

Nad Al Sheeba (office), Sheikh Rashid Plot, Dubai, UAE.
Al Quoz (storage location and cement-mixing plant), Al Quoz, Dubai, UAE.
Oilfield Supply Centre, B–15, Roundabout #8, Jebel Ali Free Zone, UAE.

The Al Moosa Tower address was never the operational home or address of HPSL. 
The  Al  Moosa  Tower  location  was  the  home,  for  some  period  of  time  of  a  branch 
office  of  Halliburton  Limited  (HL)  a  U.K.  corporation.  and  later  of  Halliburton 
Worldwide Limited (HWL), a company registered in the Cayman Islands. 
2. Status of DOJ Investigation 

a.  ‘‘Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Is  Halliburton  still  under  investigation  by  the  U.S.  At-
torney  in  the  Southern  District  of  Texas  for  possible  violations  of  terrorist  sanction 
law?’’

(35)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36

Ms.  Williams  statement  during  the  hearing  was  as  follows:  (Page  14  of  the  com-
plete transcript provided to us, or page 53 of the partial transcript) ‘‘I think the in-
vestigation  is  ongoing.  We  have  responded  to  all  of  the  inquiries  from  the  Depart-
ment  of  Justice  and  we  did  that  as  late  as  2005  and  for  the  past  24  months,  we’ve 
heard  no  additional  information  from  them.’’  Her  response  to  the  question  appears 
to  answer  the  Senator’s  question  correctly  and  fully  to  our  knowledge  at  this  time. 
The  last  submission  to  the  Department  was  in  the  Fall  of  2005.  We  have  not  been 
notified as to whether the investigation is completed or still ongoing.

b. ‘‘Senator LAUTENBERG. And please—let us see if they receive subpoenas in this 

case.’’

Regarding  the  Justice  Department’s  request  for  documents,  a  subpoena  was 
issued  only  to  the  company  and  not  to  any  individuals,  either  with  respect  to  pro-
duction  of  documents  or  to  provide  testimony.  That  subpoena  has  been  complied 
with. 
3. Your E-mail of May 14, 2007 re Questions From Senator Lautenberg 

a. What activities and contracts is KBR currently executing in Iran?
According  to  information  received  from  KBR.  neither  KBR  nor  any  of  its  foreign 
subsidiaries  is  currently  performing  work  in  Iran.  Two  foreign  subsidiaries  (GVAC 
and  MWKL)  may  have  remaining  contract  issues  or  obligations  on  contracts  under 
which they previously provided support to other companies doing work in Iran.

b. When did KBR receive its latest contract in Iran?
According  to  the  information  we  have,  the  most  recent  contracts  undertaken  by 
any element of KBR relating to Iran were entered into in April 2004. KBR, and its 
subsidiaries  maintain  that  they  have  not  sought  or  received  any  contracts  relating 
to work in Iran since the end of 2004.

c. Since September 11, 2001, what contracts did Halliburton win from the Govern-
ment of Iran? What contracts did it execute in Iran? When did these contracts begin 
and  end?  What  was  the  financial  value  of  these  contracts?  Which  economic  sector 
did  these  contracts  cover?  Which  U.S.  companies  were  subcontractors  to  these  con-
tracts? Which non-U.S. companies were subcontractors to these contracts?

Answer:

Entity 

HPSL 

Contract and Cus-
tomer (all involving 

the oil and gas

industry) 

IOOC Material 
Supply Con-
tract 

Approx. 
Value
($ 000s) 

Started 

Completed 

Completed 

Yes/No 

Sub-contracors
(all non-U.S.) 

5,543 2001

End-2005

Yes 

None

HPSL 

Petropars/(Enter-

prise) 

1,419 Pre-2001

June 2002

Yes 

HPSL 

Shell Exploration 

348

HPSL 

HPSL 

Statoil—South 

Pars 

POGC Integrated 

Services 

10,504 Q4–2003

End-2005

Yes 

16,285 Pre-2001

Q1–2006

Yes 

Frank’s Inter-

national Middle 
East LLC; 
Drilling Tools 
International 
LLC; Geo Serv-
ices S.A.

None

None

Geoservices, S.A.; 
Pathfinder En-
ergy Services 
B.V. ; Weather-
ford Oil Tool 
Middle East, 
Ltd.; Baker 
Hughes EHO 
Limited

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Entity 

HPSL 

HPSL 

HPSL 

HPSL 

Contract and Cus-
tomer (all involving 

the oil and gas

industry) 

Agip Iran BV—

(ENI) 

Petro-Iran, 
(PEDCO) 

Total—South 

Pars 

Total—Dorood 
Kharg Island 

37

Approx. 
Value
($ 000s) 

Started 

Completed 

Completed 

Yes/No 

Sub-contracors
(all non-U.S.) 

21,488 2002

June 2006

Yes 

None

27,700 2002

12,616 Q1–2002

September 

2006

November 

2005

44,717 Q2–2001 March 31, 

2007

Yes 

Yes 

Yes 

None

None

Al Ahlia Oilfields 

Development 
Company

HPSL  Norsk Hydro 

Anaran 

12,183 Q4–2002

December 

2006

Yes 

None

HPSL  OOK–POGC † 

0 N/A 

N/A 

HPSL  NIOC 

HPSL  Kala 

18,977 Pre-2001

2006

30,783 Pre-2001

2006

HPSL  Others—Misc. 

12,705 Pre-2001

2006

None

None

None

None 

Yes 

Yes 

Yes 

† In  2004  and  2005,  HPSL  negotiated  with  OOK  to  perform  services  for  POGC.  A  preliminary  agreement 
was  reached,  but  no  contract  for  actual  work  was  ever  concluded.  The  project  was  later  canceled,  and  no  work 
was ever done. 

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  17:31 Aug 01, 2007 Jkt 035959 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35959.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

